Till someone is prying that cupcake with extra topping from their cold dead hands
Thanks! They are just Ergon gp-1 grips, but the "biokork" variety.   http://www.amazon.com/Ergon-Biokork-Bicycle-Handlebar-Grip/dp/B004P8FN28
You're welcome! I don't think channeling your inner... is the proper transaltion!  That would be: sacar/canalizar/mostrar tu ... interior  I meant "to think that you are someone else, often in a bragging context" Examples: -Ha resuelto un problema de física y se cree Einstein. -Se cree Usain Bolt por haber corrido unos metros.  It is less used without the bragging part: -Tomó drogas y se creía Napoleón.  And it can be confused with the regular use of "creer" (believe), but with another use of "se" -Se creía todo lo que le decían sin comprobarlo -Él es católico, se cree que Adán y Eva existieron.  The proper use of "se" is really hard to explain, in Spain we learn it in secondary and high school grammar classes (ages 15-18) because it's a real mess, and I don't remember anything about it since I'm a science student!
I would tell the horse sweater chick to meet me out back for a quick back alley blowjob and hopefully not be discovered by my friends. Then tell her to leave and  stealthily slip back inside like nothing happened.
Soul wars is much faster way.
I'm not either, but I would very much like to be allowed to start a family without being forced to hand over the power to destroy me to someone else.
Sorry, I don't have any more left :(
But fat people are 100% not adorable. 
Waiting for the forestry students..
I think I have some pretty extensive ant colonies in my yard. I've been doing some yard work and there are dozens and dozens of tunnels to the surface. Is there anything I need to be concerned about? I'd like to keep them happy in the yard and not invite them in the house.  They don't cause harm to the grass or plants do they?  I don't use any pesticides and only a little granular fertilizer and lime in the fall. 
this is the best way to do things OP
&gt; I think the term that sums this up is "first world problems".  I think *panem et circenses* is more accurate.
Coldhand's dick?
Well should we wait for them to drive and kill somebody, then charge them?   It's not lazy legislation. It's legislation that understands that there will be false positives (people in the vehicle and not intending to drive) but allowing these false positives saves far mor elites than there are injustice of penalizing people who are actually innocent.   If you don't want a DUI, don't drive, turn on a vehicle, and sit in the drivers seat. Pretty damn simple.   (Yes I'm aware not all laws are able to be reduced similarly like this, but I feel this law is just fine as is and saves more lives in the long run). I would rather give a few an unjust DUI, and saves mor elites, rather than allow more lives to be lost. Can you really say you're DUI and inconvenience is worth more than some other persons life? 
[650 dollars for Titan X-like performance?](http://i.imgur.com/g9Mo92H.gif)
Looks like he raided Vine's closet from when Vince worn stuff a little bigger. 
As a former hotel worker, a lot
Female orgasms
IXV is meant to lead to something like X-37B, with some of the technology being potentially useful for other things.  Neither organization has much experience with space planes, so they are doing cheap, simple, low-risk experiments to test materials, aerodynamics, models, etc.
Merci. 
What did you buy?
He doesn't 
Compare it to Finland who has 50% smaller population. Medals per capita:  http://www.medalspercapita.com/#medals-per-capita:all-time  If nordic's counted as one country, we would overpowered as fuck. Finland #1, sweden #2, denmark #4, norway #6.  US is #37
There was no talk of that outside of jokes. He's in his recording studio near his house
Flash? xD
I just searched the beginning of this and it's copied and pasted from some female feminist post on facebook in 2014, apparently.  Anyway, fuck this guy.
**you can't**
after velen comes novigrad after that skellige at the end of the skellige mainquest you should get the quest regarding the so called ugliest man alive
https://itunes.apple.com/us/podcast/year-purpose-podcast-entrepreneurship/id961644268?mt=2
40 yr old here, life long renter. Why? Because I see a 20+ year home loan as modern day slavery. Instead of being chained up, I get to live in homes I could never afford and take at least one long overseas trip every year.  It's awesome, wouldn't swap it for anything. Last thing I am interested in is being the richest man in the cemetery; most travelled maybe.
At least they're finally paying Issho v Sabo the respect they deserve. It gives me hope (and goosebumps) for things to come. Don't screw this one up Toei! 
I have these. 
A portion of maximum health?! That would honestly make him awful, his Q would hurt him more than help him.
:/
The worst spot a team can be in is to be a team that NEEDS a rebuild but the organization refuses to do one.   Right now this is New Jersey, and to a lesser extent Carolina (lesser because Carolina loses enough to get good picks, and have a bit of a prospect pool already, at least compared to NJ).   Looking more long term (I.e 3-4+ years from now, I could see teams like Boston and Pittsburgh falling into a similar position -- Boston due to lackluster drafting and organizational disarray, and Pittsburgh due to the organization refusing to admit that the Crosby/Malkin domination era is fading fast, and waiting too long to do something about it.
Jackie has to start picking up the ass-shes
I REQUIRE OUTTAKES!
Fully recommend the X1.  Work-issued X1 model I have is a beast. I have a personal SP3 i7, resolution is better but the X1 beats it in pure performance. If you have external screens, go for the X1. The USB "dock" driving 2x24" monitors works like a charm (mostly)
This is weird.  There's not a single match on the PPV that I'm not interested in. 
[M] A new start, I guess. Also, no one's aware, but Tufimbe isn't his actual name, I can tell you more about his real history whenever you want.
You sound like a real fungi to be around. 
You can be socialist and also a libertarian.
It won't happen.  I wish it was an option only if you're in a 5 stack though. 
That 66 win Cavs team was [really good when he and Varejao were their only bigs on the court](http://www.82games.com/0809/0809CLE2.HTM) (and Lebron had more BPG per 100 possesions than Varejao that year), so he would just need a tall, good rebounding PF to play next to him and he would be more than fine.
I thought putting quotes around "wasted" made it clear that I was not speaking my own opinion, but quoting the opinions of others.
Pbbth.  There's nothing more stupid than trying to be "alpha" towards anyone. It's a good way to get punched in the mouth.
I don't even care about the slow, what bothers me is his giant 2.5 second aoe stun that shields him. 
How come it never looks like that when I sneeze?
[Relevant](https://www.madman.com.au/news/wp-content/uploads/2012/02/040.jpg)
Yes Olympic distance. I am used to open water swim but not in a group .. I'll try to find one with local clubs ..
Next PPV they'll be drunk, then they'll be hungover next, etc.
You know what, that was kind of inspirational.
I wear the same size in the Panache Sport and like it enough. I also tried on the [Title Nine Athena](http://www.titlenine.com/product/mobile/310131.do?sortby=ourPicks) and will definitely buy one or two soon. Both are a bit snug, but I run so the extra compression is okay with me!
http://www.monologuedb.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/03/john-turturro-as-jesus-quintana-the-big-lebowski.jpg  But seriously, dude was taking 30 10/325's a day...
That whole show is inexplicable. Entertaining. Just inexplicable.
Yeah this makes no sense whatsoever. It sounds like incorrect information, incomplete information, self-induced drama, or trolling.
Never. Work is work. Work is not personal.   Many times I've thought about how nice society would be if the courts would lock up a dude who ruins the community every time hes out.
I don't want lessons on PvP from fucking Mobius LOL... And you forfeit sub-system targeting, a highlighted target and if they hit silent running you are FUCKED fighting with nothing but visuals.   EDIT: ALSO, gimbals only do about 2/3 the damage of fixed, and don't auto-converge when un-targeted. 
I sometimes get the impression that every subscriber of /r/vexillology is also over at polandball.
THis is worthy of celebration 
E for effort! 
Nice K, right there.
this is pretty dumb logic, if you want to get your degree plenty of players who practiced enough to get to the nfl have left with useful 4 year degrees, many from top tier schools  just instead of partying, you have to study. 
I'm gonna agree with you. While I don't particularly like it or find it attractive, it does look like something that would be accetpably fashion-forward from the early-mid 90s
*She curls into a ball*
I miss this band
I don't think it will matter, no.  There isn't supposed to be any crossover.
What you would see that may indicate bias is guidance changes, upgrades, downgrades, news that could impact the price.
You know that if you'd looked up it would have dropped from the ceiling and ate off your face.
You went from giving rational somewhat reasonable responses to just blindly accusing me of autoclicking and calling me a freak, baboon, random, retard, salty, and toxic.  You are the reason this community is so terrible.
Billions of dollars. 
Bro, go to best buy.
Hey Frank
I prefer the radio edit. 
Agreed, but Ill give them a pass on this one. Not everyone can be a master of legal Ju-Jitsu like you and I.
&gt;Destiny awaits the winner  Alberto Del Rio Return confirmed
Thank you! Her name is Maggie.
I agree that Ciri's combat is quite shallow and it's a damn shame. They should've added a few spells for her to use, or abilities that acted like spells.
They are bound to sell at some point and that is Walmart's goal. It doesn't matter where they sell.
1. Elza Tries for an elza but gets Katsiguchi  2. Zelnite I HAVE **FOUR**
[Here is the one singer guys youtube channel if you want to check it out](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCGtN9Q-a3uG7899JkZwKB-g)  edit: some videos are nsfw
While doing numbers 2 and suddenly Red Foremans foot goes up my ass
Hello to you too u/cinnabubbles!
Judging from the earlier photo, that was like 3 seats away from /u/necropaw.
I thought you were a troll until I looked at your history. That said, I'd put money on the fact that you aren't exactly choosing quality girls to date. Get off okcupid and get into rehab.
I'm coming as well. 
Thank you for hatching my Growlithe.
If advertisers would get the hint that people will surrender their eyeballs in a REASONABLE exchange, they can get what they want. But they don't don't get their messages delivered because they jump on the idiot train and shove MOAR ads anywhere they can. Also, the sellers of placements fuck their own buyers over by overselling. ONE ad Hulu made me very happy. SIX ad Hulu made me leave. Hey Hulu... ONE ad should be priced 6 times higher--and you should never sell a second ad.  Probably Facebook and Google will see some correction. They are a block box to the advertiser--and some advertisers now want to verify with third party tools.   tl;dr Saturation bombing is bad. It's opposite of a REASONABLE exchange.
What the fuck kind of shit standard is that for anything?  My mom and dad don't like dance music of any type, no matter how good it is.  It's just not their thing.  Similarly, I don't like metal, and as such, it would be batshit stupid for metal fans to rate any metal album based on how I personally feel about it.   If you're looking for something with near-universal appeal, then what you're looking for is pop music (since, you know, that's what pop music *is*).
Don't suppose you have sources on that?  Just curious. 
You're strange. But always entertaining. And you're smart. A great combo.
That it is not, SipsBot's son
hey @falconarrow what are the odds that reigns will double cross ambrose?  I feel it is inevitable after how hard they are pushing the bromance
Sounds alright , I'd be willing to give it a shot atleast.
I'm not confident in either of those guys atm
That's my birthday! lucky me
The police and the prosecutor are pretty clearly the bad guys in this situation. Just saying. There's not really any other way of looking at it.
I didn't get to walk in my graduation ceremony.
It's not just a neg, it's one of the stupidest negs I've seen. He doesn't even get his racial slurs right. If he's going to be a bigoted moron, at least be an *accurate* bigoted moron.
White Man's Burden was a concept introduced by Kipling that said it was the task of the British Empire to spread their culture to the "uncivilized" African nations.
Let's see, how many of those have I experienced?  Becoming homeless - Yes, presently.  Bedbug infestation - Yes. No so bad really.  Going to prison - Not prison really, just 82 days in jail waiting on a court date. Didn't know when I was getting out till I got out.  Being lonely in my old age - I am certainly alone in my old age.  Head injury - Yes, asked the same question over and over for several hours.  People I love dying suddenly - Yes, both parents within 90 days of each other qualifies.  Impulsively acting on an intrusive thought and ruining my life - Depends  Failing uni and never getting my degree - Didn't fail but never got a degree. Only did one year.  Death by hanging - Nope, not yet.
I like that text on the side, the glitches are also appealing. 
I also want to know the set times cause I'm going to spring awakening in Chicago and I wanna know which artist I can afford to miss at edc or at spring awakening 
1) As I mentioned--I am a nanny. The families I work for agreed to take me on full time and use their back-up caregiver for 6 weeks while I am on maternity leave. I will return to them and bring baby with me. I will be quitting the position at the daycare for good.  2) Well, maternity leave would be 6 weeks without an income but I feel like our savings would really help out over those 6 weeks.  3) I'm very familiar with cloth diapering and have already sewed 3-4 diapers by hand for around $5 in total for fabric. Our apartment covers water as a utility so we wouldn't need to worry about that but we would have to worry about the electric bill for running the drier. That has a $40 allowance per month.  4) If he bails, I'm pretty screwed. Considering we fight very little, have lived together for two years, and overall have a good relationship I highly doubt he would do leave. He wants to keep the baby and does not want to adopt him/her out.
Greyjoys will be next season it is known. 
Especially from SVG. Seems like he has taken opportunity to talk bad about us, so this actually seems genuine.
I love rpgs, pokemon, final fantasy,  persona, digital devil saga, fantasy life, golden sun,   No what I dont like are mass effects awful third person shooting
It's in the middle of NYC, an already crowded place. Construction work takes room and roads, both things NYC can't just give to the construction work too much without facing huge consequences. 
Second one didn't go much better.  15th place 3 laps down after getting caught up in a lap 14 wreck.  I wrongly assumed people in the 2nd split of these races would be good enough to hold their brake.
I try to be the same online as in person.  If anything, I try to be nicer and more friendly online than in person
&gt;As the Sunday Times itself states, these accusations 'were and remain unproven'.  That's hardly a credible source.
The impact is significant with me. I used to end the day with 40-50% on my 5S and now get 20-30.  I was not using Bluetooth before. If you have Bluetooth headphones or something, the impact is basically already there for you and there shouldn't be much difference. For me, the Watch was the first Bluetooth device paired to the phone.
Someone plz add to wiki?  This is awesome.
Was totally expecting the crazy brown chick who always posts on here with her 100+ photos and always puts "med school" in her titles. You know the one.  Now that we've got that out of the way: you get a 5/10. Average looking. However,  bet your personality and your intelligence bumps you right up.
it looks perfectly fine. they get a bit woody after awhile unless I'm missing something. 
 If you don't mind ignoring everything else the game 'forces' you to do (followers, quests) you can:   * 90-91 WoD intro quests * 91-95~ Frostfire ridge cave powerfarm * 95-98 complete the bonus objectives in each zone * 98-100 farm nagrand bones once you complete the intro chain
*He's just saying that because he doesn't like Twilight. Robert Pattinson is very good looking, even if he can't act his way out of a paper bag.   FTFY
For those interested - Courtesy of http://www.angio.net/pi/   Your Flair ,  Earliest occurance (ex: 41 is position 2) * 60 , 127 * 59 , 4 * 58 , 10 * 57 , 404 * 56 , 210 * 55 , 130 * 54 , 191 * 53 , 8 * 52 , 172 * 51 , 48 * 50 , 31 * 49 , 57 * 48 , 87 * 47 , 119 * 46 , 19 * 45 , 60 * 44 , 59 * 43 , 23 * 42 , 92 * 41 , 2 * 40 , 70 * 39 , 43 * 38 , 17 * 37 , 46 * 36 , 285 * 35 , 9 * 34 , 86 * 33 , 24 * 32 , 15 * 31 , 137 * 30 , 64 * 29 , 186 * 28 , 33 * 27 , 28 * 26 , 6 * 25 , 89 * 24 , 292 * 23 , 16 * 22 , 135 * 21 , 93 * 20 , 53 * 19 , 37 * 18 , 424 * 17 , 95 * 16 , 40 * 15 , 3 * 14 , 1 * 13 , 110 * 12 , 148 * 11 , 94 * 10 , 49 * 9 , 5 * 8 , 11 * 7 , 13 * 6 , 7 * 5 , 4 * 4 , 2 * 3 , 9 * 2 , 6 * 1 , 1 * 0 , 32
But I would die because I don't have that memorized. 
**[This](http://farm5.static.flickr.com/4119/4857538171_424c876efb.jpg)** is a cob.
yeah. the part with the teeth and tongue.
I put my diglet in her cloyster if you know what I mean 
I'm so tough, I commented "dog" in /r/CatsStandingUp and the mods were too afraid to ban me.
Did you just compare school-age crap to war? I'm sure you have ptsd diagnosis right? What a generation of babies
41 and she's looking for alpha males?
You have your school ID from 22 years ago? How long did it take you to dig through your stuff to find it, or did you just have it laying around on your desk?  I'm not even sure precisely where my diploma from university is, and I graduated in 2013.
Though the exact failure rates of may vary from model year to model year, there was never a point where the issue was fixed.  There have been a number of reasons for EJ257/255 failures through the years.  There were oil pickup tube failures in the earliest generation (05) but that seemed to work itself out.  There are ongoing failures due to clogged banjo bolt filters in the turbo oil inlet, but those can be avoided by maintaining a shortened oil change interval, removing the filter or replacing all of the turbo oil plumbing with an aftermarket kit.  All that said, there has never been a real fix or even an official explanation for the ringland failures.  They seem to effect some percentage of all of the 2.5L motors.  There are many people on the forums that believe the culprit of this to be a problem in the factory tune that allows the motor to run lean under certain conditions.  If that is the case, a good custom tune should help avoid this problem.  Unfortunately there is no date of manufacture after which there are no issues.  The the EJ25 in particular can be a fairly reliable motor, but absolutely requires proper maintenance.  If you are looking at buying this car you really need to see if there is maintenance documentation, and I can't recommend having a pre-purchase inspection done enough.  A leak down and compression test should be included in that.  If it is or has been modified then you should be extra diligent!
Psn ChrisTehKid lvl 34. Lighthouse trips 3.
Collapsed veins or scar tissue. Scar tissue is most common, which is kinda like calcification. The tissue can get so hard that you can barely pierce through it. 
How often do you get off-time to spend with your family where you don't have to even think about the team, cars, or anything NASCAR related?
Stop subsidizing shit food and switch to subsidizing healthy food and bingo. 
I never said that bet was none other than rethoric speech.  And if it is good news or not, well, I think you're being too optimistic. We already have the cover for the Uncanny Inhumans (with McNiven art) bouncing around.   I sincerely hope you are right. Yet the writing has been on the wall for years.
ya I think he was planning on welching that too, but I told him I was going to play another game after I got it back.
that is miserable. I am both surprised and disheartened to hear that.  I  have really enjoyed my trips through Canada and grew up less than 100 miles from the border.  I could see myself re-locating to Toronto or Quebec.  So beautiful.  
That is no excuse. An eye for an eye mentality is complete bullshit. 
You don't think he would? Or you don't think Sansa would let him?
Shitty askreddit threads.^^^^this ^^^^one's ^^^^good ^^^^tho
Which is why it is so heavily regulated, i.e licences, speed limits, BAC limits, car registration, L and P plates. 
I know what I said.
Best for business
Burn so good even Marvin's smiling.
Is genital mutilation of males outlawed anywhere in Africa? No. Is genital mutilation of females outlawed? At least in Nigeria it is.
Which shader?
I've been hoping for Seth Rollins VS Kane at MITB
Corsairs Stronghold is 20v20. It can be kind of a clusterfuck just because anyone can queue for it from Level 30 on forward and that means you can get players who  don't pay attention to the objectives and aimlessly pvp. That happens less often than you'd actually expect though. Pvp is a lot of fun, but the gear gap between +15 BiS and even +14 BiS pvp gear is a fairly significant balance problem. EME says they're trying to address how +15 affects pvp to bring things back in line.  Edit: I play in a ranked pvp guild on MT. I don't have good gear but still have a lot of fun.
 educate yourself. the Quran does not instruct women to cover their heads. its cultural. do a 2 minute google search.  
this. last guy didnt heard him clicking his scope in the smoke...
You can watch it on projectfreetv .com They have tons of shows you can watch for free, including HBO. 
I am glad i dont have the morals of a priest. If i did i would be a much more terrible kind of person than i am right now.
No [strawpoll]
Did they do the 14th inning stretch?
Absolutely, come across a smurf every couple of games.
Can anyone hook me up with a link to a VOD? I really want to see this
I know... But still going to miss the time together!
Priaprism. Painful erection that doesn't go away and can lead to permanent penis damage. 
Thanks, getting rid of my Windows way of thinking will be hard, but at least now I know there aren't many similarities. (No extentions?!?! Dear God, what have I gotten myself into...)  I imagine the Software Repository is where all the Mint-compatible programs are indexed, kept up-to-date, reviewed, and kept Mint-compatible?  And no, I just needed an Audio Player (I think I'll try QMMP, as it looks friendlier). I'd just Googled 'Winamp Linux alternative' and was given XMMP as an option by linuxalt.com.
Should tell her about the lactose free milk you can get at Starbucks.  Tastes the exact same as regular milk. 
老荘は読んでて面白い
There are so much downvotes around here I can feel the hate radiating from my phone.
Yes, it's only for flavour. Vinegar is almost always just for flavour, as acidity is a vital component in taste overall.
cronjob
Good post.
It appears that you're posting from a brand new account, to prevent spam we automatically remove posts from new accounts. Feel free to wait a few days and try again.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/IncestPorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Funny you say that because that is when I did these pictures!  I agree I just need to take the time to play and practice.  I will check out the youtube. Thank you for taking the time to give some advice.  I appreciate the help.
A wild mod appears!   Actually, I just stumbled upon this post in the new queue - we get to posts faster if you report them :)
&gt; i think we can establish the level of seriousness/criminality is always pretty high with narcs - i think we need help with identifying the criminality in their actions  Yes, this. My therapy is good for helping me identify the criminality.
He's not excusing drunk drivers. He's excusing people who sleep it off in the parking lot. Which IMO should be perfectly legal.  I live way out in the country where a round trip to the bar in a taxi would cost an absurd amount of money. it's been years since I checked but if I remember correctly it was going to be upwards of 70 bucks just to get TO the bar on new years. I really don't care if people think I'm an asshole, or if they think I should go to jail, or even if I actually get arrested for it. If I'm drunk and don't have a DD I'm sleeping it off in my car. It's not hurting anyone(except maybe me if the seatbelt thing digs into my ribs all night).
Should someone be down voted for an unpopular opinion in a thread about that? 
Who do you guys think will win?  I have to say New Day, R Truth, Bo, Paige, Owens, and Ambrose will win.
Look at the context in which the 2nd Amendment was written. Armed citizens managed to hold off a tyrannical government long enough and successfully enough to get outside aid and secure their freedoms. You don't think that that had any bearing on the drafting of the 2nd Amendment? 
*cracks open beer*  Actually got decent hopes for this show, hope it's good!
Thanks man, I finally figured it out. It turns out the "hidesprite" command doesn't work in map scripts, but I figured out that movesprite2 and spritebehave are the only lines that work. You were a big help :)
Fortuna in gehennā non est.
The loop is slightly unsettling, don't know why
[Google cached version](http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache%3Ahttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.seattletimes.com%2Fnation-world%2Fquiet-us-hurricane-zones-just-waiting-for-their-luck-to-run-out%2F)
Actually, that makes my statement correct. If the list was made because of them, that would indeed mean that they are on it, no?
The mechanism of firearm injuries is well studied. You yourself acknowledged that we know how many injuries occur, but ignored that we also know where people are shot and the effects of being shot.   I recall public funding for an experimental treatment regiment in Pittsburgh just last year, where gunshot victims are to be treated by inducing hypothermia to give trauma surgeons more time to save lives. Such experimental procedures are only possible with the extensive research into the mechanisms of firearm injuries that you say simply doesn't exist.   As I said before, the ban applies only to the political aspects. It does NOT apply to research into the treatment of gun injuries. It does NOT apply to research into the effects on the human body of lead, propellant fumes, noise exposure, etc. The ban is solely on research that is in the public's legal interest rather than their health interests. 
Just wondering what happened to Odessa massacre investigation, it must be the first time that a crime has been broadcast on live TV, yet it is impossible to find the perpetrators. But fear not, guy that like to chew on his tie is there to make "investigation" credible...
Honestly, I'm trying to get through daredevil, and its just kind of hard. Its a much slower story compared to what I'm used to with the MCU, and It's not my cup of tea. I will finish it because I love the MCU, but its going to have to get better for me to change my mind. Best part of the show so far IMO is the relationship between foggy and murdock.  And I know everyone is saying how great a villain kingpin is, but he just seems really forced. I've seen him a handful of times and I already feel beaten over the head with the whole "Thinks he is saving hell's kitchen but is really just as bad as everyone else." He's a fucking lunatic. He smashed a dude's head off with a car door because he interrupted a first date with a girl he's spoken to twice. He's just not at all a believable person. Just my take on it, but I'm only about 1/2 way through. 
I want an e30
I'm guessing he fell asleep.
-986 dollars and counting. Still owe 500 for this month's bills and this month is over tomorrow so I'll just carry that debt over to next month. If they repo my car am I just done with it or how does that work? 
Praise Jizzus!
Ah, I had a similar idea, I was gonna make a post about elite Titans battling for us but never got around to making it. I was gonna release a suggestion "Tai-Taihn the Betrayed" where when you attain him (or her) the hero would assume a random Titan (but more goofy) and that Titan as your enemy would have half the health, I guess no chestersons because there's an artifact for that but I also guess it would be like a second dark cloak, but hey other effects could be used, and we could place him at 40 notations above lord or something, it would still require an evolve. As for the King idea, I had another one, "Satieri the Fairy King" where fairy chests would drop twice as often once attained and you might finally get that zerk you were waiting for, the he could be placed at 40 notations above Tai-Taihn so it would be like E+236, could get us to 3k, last one is "Lavalier the Giver of Gifts" and he would assume an angel shape to oppose lord and he could grant your friend or allies your tap damage for 5 secs or something, he could be 40 exponents above Satieri, so that might place us at like 3k5, just something I want to write out, make any corrections or comments if you like as this is a rough draft.
Repost Cops need to be banned.
Pretty sure that's what casual means, dude. 
Let us settle this right now...IF the earth WAS flat, then how is it the you can keep traveling in any direction NSEW, and keep repeating it? If the earth were flat, one would simply run into a wall when they reached the end, right?
It's a gimballed cup holder, not gyroscopic, but still pretty cool.
Ok, thats exactly what I was planning on doing.  I don't know when I'll have time to as I'm still sorting but I will be doing it soon.
It depends on the major and the school. If you go to a college instead of a university often times you will not be required to take a foreign language. There are also requirements (at least in the USA) for the types of classes required in order to attain certain types of degrees. Most bachelor of arts programs require a foreign language where a bachelor of science program usually does not but instead requires some computer programming type course.
I am extremely offended that he actually said "nigg**". Why didn't NBC censor that word?
Yeah, it is easy to defend yourself from terrorists without weapons
Nice job!  Your final product reminds me of the robots that Simon Stålenhag has in his Wild Mecha collection
I think this is a genius move. They all but flat out said Reigns is turning heel tonight. So everyone is expecting a double cross. If he doesn't betray Ambrose tonight despite the obvious signs, then he looks like the best bro ever and this will definitely make people like him more
Destiny awaits? Del Rio confirmed
They ask dispatch to send a regular unit, if there's isnt one there as backup already. 
No, thank you, nothing feels better than making someone laugh.  edit: except maybe karma, karma is nice
He's such a beautiful man. 
Thank you for drawing my weird Maggie thing. I think mirrorshades are the bomb, and I love how you drew them.
Gorgeous.
I never realized that game was a no-hitter. 8BBs, though.
Can use you if still interested
Oh my god. That is awful! I am so sorry for you having to go through that, no one should have to be treated that way. Super sad to hear it is rubbing off on the little ones. Very, very sad.
Why the hell would you want this?
I connected it with Tsugumi's [bow](http://41.media.tumblr.com/80b27343cd12b510ac20c42581704562/tumblr_n1hmyfHTX61rmhz1lo4_1280.jpg) but I'm sure I'm just lacking sleep.
"Mario kart style" so it's a kart racing game? -_-
Awesome designs! I wouldn't think automatically that lapis would have a darker shade of skin, but it suits her!
ROW ROW!!
This might be the movitation I need to quit smoking.
1. You need a Mac  2. You need a Mac with USB 3.0 Ports  Not exactly accessible.
"Sounds like someone has a case of the Mondays..."  Police (political, economic, religious) harassment is what our grandparents left their old-countries to escape... here we go again?
Where is the brilliant move? Couple of good tackles after poor rugby from the BaBas. If this is English brilliance bring on the WC. 
Somebody pls https://flightaware.com/
Check out their Twitter. They had a good amount in stock this AM
I think different movies can be dense in different ways. I wouldn't really consider any of the movies you posted to be be very dense. When I think of dense movies films like *Inherent Vice*, *Interstellar* and *Barry Lyndon* -- all for different reasons. With IV it's densely plotted, with BL it's densely shot, and with IS I think it's general timeline and use of space (pun not intended) is what makes it dense. 
Never again. 
yep
That seems pretty recent. If it had been going on for years, it would be pretty weird to have it solved by some random adventurer coming into town. 
A correct statement until about 2 days ago: [Material Design Support Library.](https://plus.google.com/+AndroidDevelopers/posts/XUDGFS9eYxg) Exciting stuff :)
You gave me an idea. Maybe kaneki's appearance is affected by Haise's perception  of who kaneki is. At first, haise saw kaneki as someone who was invading and trying to take over his mind. After seeing hinami try to protect him, he realized Kaneki couldn't possibly be as bad as he thought. This chapter, he see's kaneki as a scared helpless kid who doesn't want to disappear either. 
Brutal.  I'm at caribou trying to write, and it's been 5 hours and I've only written 750 words.  So, I'm trying to figure out my best plan of attack with a little therapeutic redditting.  You?
Hi Beth, I have lived with PSC for 10 years and am now entering transplant assessment phases.  I am a member of the facebook group PSC Partners seeking a Cure support group, their is a closed group and open group, at his been a huge support system for myself and many others, their are members from all over the world. She may want to look into it
パセリ、バジル、紫蘇は植えておけば勝手に大きくなる
I think its EXTREMELY important to find a career you find interesting and exciting, as well as a profession or workplace that is conducive to your workflow.  For example, im in a job as a financial analyst that presents a different challenge everyday, and is pretty cyclical.  I usually have a month that im working insanely hard, and then another that is pretty low key.  Not to mention if i shift my schedule by an hoir here or there nobody cares as long as the project is finished in time.  It turns a lot of my weaknesses into strengths.  Don't get me wrong, there's still a lot of stuff to work through- every job has a set of uninteresting and repetitive tasks that just need to get done, but I feel like mine are minimal and/or the work that is produced during crunch time is the performance that stands out, not so much the shortcomings. Again, its not a total cop out, it just makes things so much easier.  
I keep them on my Facebook to remind me that I have work to do.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aPQyhvbvrXU HA, way fucking better angle  0:29.
Thats because almost all growers don't grow with males in the group which would pollinate the females and grow seeds. The plant uses resources to grow the seeds instead of trichomes resulting in less potent weed.
Wounded by third eye blind Touches on Sexual abuse
I find Raylene and Zoey Holloway to be pretty kind and loving. it's mostly MILF/mother-son themed stuff though. here's a couple that i watch  http://www.pornhub.com/view_video.php?viewkey=1139660622  http://www.pornhub.com/view_video.php?viewkey=168201297  http://www.pornhub.com/view_video.php?viewkey=813908202  http://www.pornhub.com/view_video.php?viewkey=453590248  
Takes to long to turn off and my meeting is in fifteen minutes. 
My screen is only showing Motorolas on this deal
I know some like to wear the bra over so the garment seams don't show through the shirts/blouses.
I added you and my username is CE.
"Why you are in Bronze"  To find statements that imply causation, you don't have to look further than in the headline.
I'm so color blind, it looks like a regular golden to me :(
Haha Steve and Bob taking the mick out of the Cubs fan was funny =]
Especially when their favorite names for him are "Little Hitler" and "Nazi Banana".
CHEATING IS FUN GUYS  LETS GOD HACK AND NO VEST
2b reporting in
Honestly the chilliest cops I've met are in Adelaide, but that's mostly because we're pretty much a city of hippies and trying to crack down on weed would be too big a job.
San Francisco, CA
The one who attacks silence first, so, it will survive.
Cool,  best of luck😁let's us know how it goes! 
I like the way that they walk  And it's chill to hear them talk  And I can always make them smile  From White Castle to the Nile
And cam pin and cotter pin. 
Yes!
I believe in Randle too. 
Ostracism is not really a problem for me or my husband, but since moving isn't in the cards for the next few years, I bide my time when it comes to Fundies in general. This Duggar thing has really brought to light for me, though, how awful some people are. Very well, no more contact with those people.   My children are a different matter. Bullying and ostracism are a very real and hurtful thing when you're small. Kids don't understand why their parents don't want your kids to play with them, but they sure will run with it.   I have no problem calling out people in person, but why not just block someone on FB? I'm not changing their minds and they aren't changing theirs. 
spot on 
Ambition will suck too
Good luck getting carried through the hardest pvp game mode.. 
Statue of Liberty, Mount. Rushmore, an Amish village, a Native American reservation (that's what they are called, right?), and the Chrysler Building.
Isn't it obvious that a right wing hindu nationalist party will protect the interests of typical Hindus? 
couple spring to mind  Fortress Borders mod, makes forts grab land (and theres another fort mod i believe that improves them)  and the Canada civilization, whos unique unit is a cannon that deals double damage when setup in a fort, which it can construct. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=231775803
It is highly common on Jeeps but my 96 Bronco would do it if you hit the right kind of bump... you either had to power out or slow down - but you never knew which one would work...
Could you just say that you're Muslim, but " not practicing?"
Probably because family's are smaller therefore you can put hot childcare into a single one instead of spreading it out amongst others
Please edit out the IVs since they're against this sub's rules.
Umadnerd?
Unfortunately, you CAN use any kind of onion and I'll still have severe gastrointestinal distress within 30 minutes.   Fuck onions.  
I been caught time to run
✓ never married  ✓ was bitter  ✓ and poor  ✓ was an atheist, too  ✓ born in saxony  ✓ fled to work in the west  ✓ went on holidays to Italy  ✓ is rumored to be a nazi  Yup! He's an Ossi.
[Source](http://www.pixiv.net/member_illust.php?mode=medium&amp;illust_id=48509052)
Why?  I feel like so many "rural" Norwegians (or people from similar areas) want to "be a part of the world" so they want to go to the big cities etc.. But I don't get it. 
You have three lanes in each direction but only two offramps. Won't that make one lane unused?
[Everything!](http://i.imgur.com/6oOs5Yy.png) 
Might want to update my GPU at some point. Let me make sure I pay attention to the spec (for my PC and GP) and the price before I decide.
soursteezelxo 34 titan if you invite me please be good
Anytime, buddy.
Up My Sleeves  The Powers That B  Punk Weight  You Might Think He Loves You
I feel a little older now that the song is *at least* two and a half years old... but it's still one of my favorites. I was going to make some sort of animation myself, but... lost track of time and ended up abandoning it. This one is absolutely incredible, and that's an INSANE amount of effort. The time invested by WarpOut and others definitely paid off. What a gorgeous piece of artwork. Animation is by no means easy, even animatics. 
Same here. Gave it the "OK" on a first listen. Now I can't stop hitting repeat.  The release of this album can't come soon enough.
So mojang add a suggestion
 *Nope.*
How the hell is it this bad? It seems like such a simple thing to me, go on games played or ratio of games won, or a combination of both. I mean, I am not a programmer, I know some and have very minor knowledge on this topic, but it seems like a simple fix.
This OP is just another run-of-the-mill Alarmist.
And it was grape specifically. I didn't do it, but somebody else did. This whole scene was built on Race Play, which is a touchie subject anyway. Honestly, it was hilarious in its ridiculousness.
Hmm we've kind of established a friendship now..and I'm not hurting or upset or anything anymore.. how would I go about asking for no contact now after already getting back on track as friends? I can see why you say that though 
HERE WE HYPE
Shout out that I want everyone to unfriend me and incentivize by giving 10 bucks for it.
Yeah, get it right 1 in 10 times and you're suddenly a prophet on Reddit.
What kind of doses are you running the MT2 at?
If an apology is genuine and I trust there are going to be life changes, then I can accept it. But I haven't forgiven my bf, I'm having a hard time moving on, and believe me, my thoughts are preoccupied with the fact that he cheated 
I went through this with a guide I recently re-wrote for my current job.  It was such a pain finding the bits to get things working correctly.  I spent a few weeks combing through configuration files because the documentation is so sparse.  I think there should be a medal for those who manage to get that monstrosity of a mailserver working.
Accurate.
Wow. I love it!
I was planning on going to the zoo for my birthday, this fucked those plans up.
Maybe she just read some scripts for season 2 and she's trying to subtly spoil it for you!
nope.
I can promise you the female characters are great to look at!
[What have you done today to improve yourself?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BQ4yd2W50No)
so is Dolph
Just niggers nigging it up on the northside again lol. When we gonna get more programs for dem kids?
Which is why it is important to be involved with multiple things. 
I too wish I had a dash cam but don't like wires or plugs in the 12volt port all the time. I've been looking b
And you didnt understand apparently...  It depends on the damage per shot of the weapon and how much damage is "wasted" on the last shot that would normally kill someone.
Wow good. Im glad you are understanding things and making useful comments.   Im pissed off i had to send you 20-30 comments just so we could make this clear.   You should of not thought this was a joke. You obviously had not read any of the other comments. This thread didn't get many view or comments. But if you had looked at my comments, you would have seen i made no secret of the quality.   Next time. Think and read before you blurt out useless comments.  Thanks for the reply. Wanker cunt. 
Lucid Echoes is miles better than Ghox in constructed.
On mobile this site just loads article after article on my phone.
Good feedback. Thanks!
The Canadian women's team is really good, and we're hosting the women's World Cup. We also have teams in MLS, and there are a shitton of soccer fans in the major cities.
The Sleep from Pantera. Chills the entire solo. 
It was never confirmed i believe
Careful - slipping and falling caused the deaths of Kurt Vonnegut and Dr Atkins.
I have similar issues and the reason why is because I don't feel the sexual desire when that happens. Only my need for validation for it to go well. What helps me is to think of everything in your interactions that you legitimately find sexually attractive and let your arousal and tenson build. Spend some time to sit and think what you are attracted to. Then embellish and indulge a bit on the healthy ones. See a florescent bra strap that is showing to the side of a girls' shirt? Maybe it's the way she smiles at people, or moves around. It could even be the shade of nail polish she is wearing. A genuine compliment to someone who spends some time to look nice, especially if it's something that turns you on, and  something she does that lets her show off her personality (oh god I love it when women stick the flower in the hair, I don't even know why) makes escalation much easier.   I say cut down masutrbation to once week ish, and instead of porn, let your material come from your interactions.   If you escalate when you're not feeling anything,or are focused on "needing something to work", it comes off as forced, needy, and creepy
SJ and the problems GamerGate is fighting are inextricably linked. 
Tough but that's on him.
Put two halves of a potato in with the sauce. It will absorb the salt. 
exp(log(x)) is equal to x when it is *defined*, which is only the case for positive x.
Fucking fucktards. The world is full of them. I myself happen to be one so I'm an expert. 
So? None of the super-villain parents in *Runaways* were established characters. Except for Ultron, but him and Victor come in until later anyway.
At least it wasn't vertical video.
Repost Cops need to be banned.
you could google and throw one together yourself bud ;)
It definitely looks that way, I didn't think they'd have the balls to do it but i looks like that's definitely where they're headed.
&gt; Hitlers soldiers were just normal dudes, so were Mussolini's and Mao's and Stalin's. Normal dudes sometimes commit atrocities.  In none of those countries did the military openly attack a peaceful mass protest.  I'm aware of the ability for human atrocity, I just don't think it will happen here.  You're free to disagree and arm yourself for the likelihood, I just think you should spend your time worrying about problems that might occur.   &gt;Hitler rose to power legally in a democratic nation.  Sure.  And he wasn't overthrown by German citizen militias with WWI weapons.  He was defeated by a foreign military. &gt;Kent State Ohio military personnel killed protesters.   You don't think that's an isolated incident? They killed 4 people.  That's not what we're talking about.   &gt;Might want to rethink your 0% likelihood.  Nah.  But go ahead and spend thousands of dollars on guns and ammo because you're paranoid.   &gt;I mean fuck you don't think citizens are ever oppressed violently by their own governments?   Did not say that.   &gt; In what world do you live?  The one where you wouldn't stand a chance in a firefight with the US Military.  And the one where the US Military wouldn't allow themselves to be used against the citizenry.  You know, the real world.  How's your bunker btw?   Got enough spam?   &gt;As for me I'm stuck in the real world and prepared to fight to maintain my liberty and yours as well if it ever comes down to it.  Well it's never come close to happening in our entire history.  So history seems to favor my view.   &gt;I hope it doesn't, but if it does I'd rather not be throwing rocks and hitting with sticks.  You might as well be throwing rocks with sticks.  If you really want to prepare for an asymmetrical war with the US military, you need high explosives to make IEDs, not AR-15s. 
Precisely my point. All I'm trying to say is that this "solution" may actually make the situation worse for some.
Becoming swole of the mind is also key
Why? Why can't he call them lizard men? Is it somehow impossible for there to be another (humanoid) reptilian species in the game apart from the illujanka?
Well that's where you went wrong; downtown is good. Very good. You'll have to come back!
Well, time to read that story again
Well now you're just instigating. It isn't appreciated. 
No more than if you're part of a labor union or contribute to any other lobby (e.g. the ACLU or EFF).  Sure, money buys influence. It always has and always will, but that's why there's other organizations that pool resources to make their voice louder. There's literally thousands of them and they represent just about every cause imaginable. And the law says we don't get to pick and choose who gets to have a voice based solely on who they are.
no. they didnt think clinton was going to release info about nibiru. And they certainly didnt think bush was going to. As the bush crowd had nefarious plans - 9/11 &amp; the iraq war, etc to dominate the world. The zetas claim to be able to read anyone's mind. They say the aliens in the "Service-to-other" orientation (i.e. good ones) who are in the majority are able to do so.  --------------------------------------  See the 2 links below on the plans the bush crowd were laying:   *"911 was False Flag as Dick Cheney was orchestrating the event, at the helm, though he will never be brought to justice for this. This and the US electoral fraud in 2000 and 2004 via Diebold paperless voting machines is considered too shocking for the American public to handle, and thus will be suppressed forever. The UK False Flag on 77 was done by the UK for the benefit of Bush/Blair during the Iraq war, to motivate doubters in the UK. MH 017 was downed by Kiev in an attempt to engage Europe to fight Ukraine’s battles."* - http://zetatalk.com/ning/17ja2015.htm  &amp;  [ZetaTalk: North American Union](http://www.zetatalk.com/index/zeta394.htm)
There isn't any *formal* instructions that I am aware of. I just got the parts from IKEA and centered the legs and drilled/screwed the legs to the desk. It was really simple.   Here is my comment from a previous post about it:   The [desk top](http://www.ikea.com/us/en/catalog/products/50106773/) - IKEA Gerton $89.99  The [legs x2](http://www.ikea.com/us/en/catalog/products/20056915/) - IKEA Galant $30.00 ea.  The [underframe](http://www.ikea.com/us/en/catalog/products/30252906/) - IKEA Bekant ~$30.00  The underframe was in a separate box and only cost about $30 without the legs like those shown in the last link.
&gt; The US is pretty dull in general  California is, the US has a lot of awesome nightlife places. The issue California has is the idiotic drinking laws. Who's stupid idea was it to make alcohol illegal to sell after 2am? Most of my nights out are just starting to pick up around 2am and then the night essentially finishes because the alcohol is cut off. No one is going to wait around until 6am to carry on the party once the bars can start serving again.
Another (12/12)  It began greatly, but everything kind of fell apart by the end. The characters were really stupid and underdeveloped. The gore was great though.
Should I start Reignover or IWDominate (or maybe Airwaks)?
The first series will be two runs to set up 3rd and long and them an incomplete pass. Be like old times
Yeah she definitely deserved it but he shouldn't have done that in front of cops and especially after she had grabbed her purse and walked away. They obviously had to arrest him as well.
I live in Australia, but I have to get my contacts tailor made and shipped from the UK.  I don't even try to tightline anymore if I'm going to be wearing my contacts...
This is $CAD.I want to purchase from a canadian company.Where in canada is this combo cheaper?  actually this is a little better https://www.oculusrc.com/product/fat-shark-predator-v2/
Another vote for Durovis.. Which phone are you using with the Dive?  I am considering getting some of the updated 32mm Divbe lenses for a DIY HMD.
is this a thing? "rate my steam profile" ...wtf man
So sign me up as yet another fairly extroverted woman in her mid-20s with no real close friends. There are a lot of people I spend time with but no one I feel close enough to to have an intimate conversation (aside from my boyfriend). In short, it's really easy for me to host a party and have a great time mingling, but if I am having a hard day and just want to talk to someone? I don't have a single person to call.   It's kind of a relief that I'm not the only one, but it makes me sad that it's such a common issue...
Have you ever tried volunteer work? Sometimes helping someone with their problems is the best way to solve your own. You can wallow in self-hate and continue being 'pointless', or you need to find meaning yourself. Here's a great speech. It's long as hell, but please read it.  http://news.utexas.edu/2014/05/16/admiral-mcraven-commencement-speech
Spencer is not a part of us "bubba boys" sorry to say :(
At face value it is.  These character shots are not satirical, that's not to say the final comic won't be, but it's fair to say now that it's reaching to describe it as satire.   &gt;It's Robin and Tam Tam aka Shazam  Why did you repeat 'It's Robin'?   Plus why the Wonder Twins...could have used Hawk Girl or Super Girl instead of them.  *Edit*:  I see your other post with Super Natural so ignore that last comment (nice to see a character shot of her too).  
I too had this for a while, then I changed optometrist, got new lenses for astigmatism and found out that my weaker eye turned off when looking farther than a few meters. And I started to wear my glasses at all times, not just when I really needed it. I also had the Alice in Wonderland syndrome where you see the surrounding objects far bigger or smaller than they really are. For the fear of falling up I too did not think it could be eye related, but it stopped with the other perception related stuffs. I hope I could help some of you.
that is because that was your only drop from ranking up.
Making me feel good about being a mousejoy pilot guys. 
I gasped. Wow. You are so hot, gorgeous, every word in all languages for handsomeness combined. Thank you, babe!
I would argue for a sci-fi movie, 2001 A Space Odyssey.  The visuals in that movie have held up extremely well likely due to the large amount of practical effects used by Kubrick.  Also the message of the film is as relevant as always.
These are great, love them. Any plans to do more designs such as other ships or the logos of the various powers being introduced in Powerplay?  I'm going to have to find a use for all of these in my life.
I wouldn't be surprised if he's nerfed to 75-78 pace next year
make vodka , and "Burn This Bitch Down". Only you left.
Je serais plus pour la bière perso car j'ai fait un peu une overdose de restos récemment! 
I think that it's understandable, and respect your opinion! I just think there is hope still, but it largely depends on the individuals, and also finding out the core reason he is being such a fuck-up right now.   But then again I'm the kind of person that eats kiwis with the skin on so maybe I'm just an optimistic weirdo.
Pfft......toons
I just wanna see Kofi's head through the chains again. 
&amp;#3232;_&amp;#3232;
"It's the containment that's a problem. I'm working on it." *He declares with a wave of his hand.*
Nah man thats just the opposite of a concentration curl, its like a distraction curl
Well I sure like her....  But....if you've ever tried cooking something with hot fat, it is NOT a good idea to do with that much exposed skin....even from a few feet away you can still get spits.... 
The dragon slayer falls in love with the dragon.
Yeah I always assumed he was like a Humanoid Basset Hound of something
How about that classic western shot. The one where the view is from behind and through the legs of one of the characters looking at another character right before the duel is about to start. Couple of tumbleweeds and some dust kicking up...  This shot  http://stuffpoint.com/westerns/image/338420-westerns-once-upon-a-time-in-the-west-screenshot-duel.jpg  I'd put Ocelot in the background and have Big Boss' legs on the sides.
ok thanks. will look into other sub ohm tanks for the time being.
Why don't you ask Uncle Google, OP?
Living in America and trying not to raise an American is virtually impossible, however raising a Jew to follow Judaism, is much much more difficult to do. Unlike being American, we have to constantly work to follow Judaism today. 
It's not even really that, though.  I didn't list Explosive Blast, for example, but that AoE is way smaller than most of the primaries, yet it still has a coefficient similar to the other spenders.  (4% for normal hitboxes, 2.4% for the larger one, 1.3% for the chain one - note that's the coefficient, so multiply by .43)  That's compared to Spectral Blade, with a further range (granted it only hits forward in about a 90 degree cone) at no cost and no cooldown (Explosive Blast has both) yet Spectral Blade has about 7 times the proc coefficient.
&gt;tfw moon lander continues working after touchdown
&gt;Does Australia have anything in the way of school loans/funds? I just see you flourishing like crazy in university.  Well, y'know. I'll probably be back at uni one day.  &gt;If I can say something on par about your development, I have noticed the frame of reference move subtly from external validation to inward, which is fucking huge man. It's been a painful process I assume. I know mine has. Don't forget to take the time to really enjoy the world.  Maybe I'm just trivializing it, but it really wasn't as hard as I expected. For the most part, time's just helped resolve it all. But my Mom gets to me - she doesn't even speak nicely to you unless you have a job.
I never got the chance to take an econ class in high school, what is the best way to learn it on my own? 
Looks like they made them a bit bigger so two people can fit.
Brian Boitano should be the one holding this for you. 
yeah, i could tell it was bs from the moment i saw it. the gamepad was slanted a bit but the image was level.
If you buy these and use them in push-pull you'll be getting around 35C Idling. I used this setup for a while until I went matx. 
They always could go back before the current Witcher games, they have alot of material to draw from.  It doesn't necessarily mean that Geralt can't be the lead.
Thank you !!! Love Wezz stuff :) 
I haven't yet had any. Then again, neither I nor my wife advertise my affiliation. Personally, though I don't hide it or deny it when asked, I'll start advertising the fact that I am a Mason overtly when I feel myself worthy of being associated with so great an institution.
They are nowhere near on the same level as golden immortals, there's literately a 15$ difference 
Spider-Man lives in the same exact city where the invasion happened, Thor TDW happened in Britain,whereas Iron Man was last seen in LA in Iron Man 3....big difference.
Dang. I thought this priest flair would help hide the truth.
&gt; But what makes your students successful isn't only how you teach them, as much as how they mentally perceive the information. What separates the standard trader from the smaller group of successful traders is how their mind compartmentalizes the information.  So basically, it's like learning math. 
please flair your post  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/laptops) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yes and like 2 drops. 
hi this is LS but p. much i was threatened with super personal info and laid sort of low for a few weeks and shit was fine but then everything i use got reported and (almost all) deleted apparently. idfk what happened but its all kaput now so now im just like, chillin'. 
At least Nigeria is getting a little bit more progressive, not by much, but a step in the right direction.
 Posts without a detailed body of text are considered low effort posts - as such, your post has been removed.   Not sure what to say? If you're posting a discussion post or question, consider answering your own question, or giving some discussion starters. You're welcome to amend your post and repost it. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/anime) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I feel you on that one. half the time on CT side "lemme see your howl!!1!" on T side "lemme see your Fire Serpent!!1!"
,,A detailed description of everything that happened from 2015-2115''
GT sucks is a circle jerk, GT doesn't suck is a circle jerk... Can't a guy just have an opinion :(
We are not a super center....but one ims will do 515 and more  a day and we pick from every department.. 
Thanks!
**Molten Ooze**   *Large ooze, unaligned*   ___ **Armor Class** 9   **Hit Points** 76 (8d10 + 32)   **Speed** 15', climb 15' ___ STR | DEX | CON | INT | WIS | CHA :-:|:-:|:-:|:-:|:-:|:-:| 15 (+2)|8 (-1)|19 (+4)|3 (-4)|7 (-2)|2 (-4) ___ **Damage Immunities** fire, slashing   **Damage Vulnerabilities** cold   **Condition Immunities** blinded, charmed, deafened, exhausted, frightened, prone   **Senses** blindsight 60', passive Perception 8   **Languages** --   **Challenge** 3 (700 XP) ___ ***Amorphous.*** The ooze can move throught a space as narrow as 1 inch without squeezing.  ***Molten.*** The ooze is made from various molten mass which remains superheated by its own internal processes. Any creature who touches the ooze takes 7 (2d6) fire damage. At the start of its turn, if the ooze took cold damage since its last turn, its speed is reduced to 5' and loses its immunity to slashing damage until the start of its next turn.  ***Spider Climb.*** The ooze can climb difficult surfaces, including upside down on ceilings, without needing to make an ability check. ___ **--Actions--**  **Slam.** *Melee Weapon Attack:* +6 to hit, reach 5', one creature. *Hit:* 6 (1d8 + 2) bludgeoning damage and 3 (1d6) fire damage.  **Engulf.** One creature within the ooze's reach must succeed on a DC 14 Dexterity saving throw or become grappled by it. The grappled creature moves with the ooze, and takes 21 (6d6) fire damage at the start of each of its turns.
Always glad to hear someone completed their game. I can't download the game. Play store says that it's not available in my country. I'm from Serbia.
It didn't kill watch again the bullet ricochets 
It's like a big rave on a beach in Thailand that involves a large bucket of alcohol I'm pretty sure
The Declaration of Independence would be a good one since it is a reminder of what can happen if you break your oath.
Sweet! He looks like a sith-pureblood, but with horns!
"Sheamus has never held the title, he's hungry...."  So is Ryback.
*I tur your face towards me and kiss you gently.*
In section e) they are being transferred TO another group. Like [in this case](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kidnapping_of_children_by_Nazi_Germany). Forcing them to go to school isn't the same thing as abducting them as children and having them adopted by white families.
Wait so how often do we get drops from the new collection? Im rank five and I have only gotten 1 drop
There is not a pregnant woman out there who isn't informed of the risks of miscarriage and still birth, and the availability of late term abortion if a problem does arise. It's a constant fear. Every morning I wake up thinking "I hope it's still alive and doesn't have a hole in it's head." This had me in tears because it's my greatest fear.  Edit: just lurked your comment history. You're a jerk.
Does that "2 more" include volume 4? Cause Shueisha will probably release up to volume 6 by the end of the year.
Fantastic. The "why" truly paid off.
It's a great tank if you know your Shermans. For example, I was being pinned down by an enemy T-34 (teir III) so I ducked under a hill and then behind a building. They kept shooting my turret but failed to disable my gun. Thinking I was dead, the T-34 gets his KV-1 friend to help him finish me off.  As the T-34 was rounding the corner, I shot him in the front with one AP shell. Then the KV-1 fails to pen my armor, so I managed to kill the KV-1 with a shot to the transmission, machine gunner, and driver with one AP shell.  TL;DR  Stay calm, aim steady, don't show your side armor, and kill everything you see. Too many people underestimate the M4A2 (76) W.
Can i ask what was posted 
Yeah?  Eh, maybe I'll give it a whirl.
It went one step ahead from ass and got 💩
THM - 26 Swiftcast MANDATORY  ACN - 34 Eye for an Eye / Virus   WVR/ALC/LTW/GSM to 40 for repairs (50 for Heavensward)
It does not no.
Headphones
This comment is so edgy, I almost cut myself on it. 10/10 
Girls northeastern's is absolutely not a crapshoot and hasn't been for a while. Amherst always wins.
Yes, this was taken at F45 for 2 seconds with Hitech .6 Grad ND filter covering 3/4 of the lens. At this exposure and without the filter, the dark areas were -1.9 EV and the brightest white clouds were +3.6 EV.  I have been able to push Velvia 100 to ~4.5 stops fine so was expecting the same with Velvia 50 but was bummed about the lack of sky detail. I also processed this at home and given the size of the film, I processed it for 5% longer so I am not sure if I overexposed or overdeveloped the highlights.   Expensive film to "play" with
I went to a Common concert years ago. Front row. I did *not* brush up on his older stuff. I'm rapping every like 6th word and he sees me. He starts a line, holds out the mic to me, and I just stare at him.  He looked at me in disgust.   That moment haunts me to this day
Or a scene from some indie movie whose theme is primarily "coming of age."
all the feels. all of them
This is also why he has lots of sex and a decent car!
That's what mine looked like for a few months before I was diagnosed with ulcerative colitis.  I had an ostomy bag a year later that I'll have for the rest of my life.  It's not certain, and I'm not a doctor, but do be prepared for possible bad news. Also, hospitals ask for an ID but don't require it.  If you memorize a fake name/ss#/address etc, you never get a bill.  I know people don't like to break the law and somehow see not paying hundreds of thousands of dollars to a corporation for the right to stay alive as an immoral act, but sometimes you have to do what you have to do.
wtf don't make come at ur neck i swear to god ill lay u down
DO NOT DO THIS WARNING WARNING  You have no idea what she's like in person, you are building an idealized thing in your head that no person will live up to.  ALSO, why are you stalking.  STOP IT.  CALM DOWN.  
Orange master race. 
More like Ren-bae Young
Yeah that's true. It'll be frustrating I'm sure, but you gotta do what you gotta do
You might miss a few details, but you can just read the story online anyway.  Honestly though, it's a fighter, it's never gonna be about the story. 
Can you show us a confirmed report of that?
I tried that. My bios is using 64 already and I've installed the proper kext to support the graphics
So... Muses confirmed to have leggings? I'm liking it.  ...I'm getting a "You have to accept you're a cherub and stop hiding behind your trollsona" vibe from the last panel...
Your entirely correct in those game modes magi's isn't nearly as valuable but if you live even one more second what happens if you get that kill ? Maybe it would allow that one second to hope on suku and jump away 
That would be a bitch to mow
Invite only: https://www.amazon.com/oc/dash-button
Why did I not think of this?  Good choice!
And every year the Dutch send flowers blablabla......
5/5 came over to get her hair done, was super nice and kind! http://www.reddit.com/r/ACTrade/comments/37mvsb/lf_shampoodle_ft_40k/
what was that supposed to be? a music video?
Haha up vote for the good humor.
If you're not gaming on Linux, use the open-source AMD drivers, and it should be fine. Even with some games, it should be fine. But if you want to play games with performance rivaling what you'd get on Windows, NVIDIA is really the only option.
Spitting in my spaghetti rings
It would be a steal, if you do not care about audio quality. Other than that there isn't much to add, it's a cheap headset, that's pretty much all it has going for it.
Randy Orton mystery man confirmed?!
Could be he was going for the same thing as the skrulls? Maybe he wanted to create some Ultron/Super Adaptroid hybrids. That's the only thing that makes sense to me, at least.
Such a badass  http://24.media.tumblr.com/cd3cea309a8599da8d7b64d011843f27/tumblr_mvihbvAAET1qjiqu6o1_1280.png
Only one over the summer. 
Well ... I wish I could give you some solid advice ... PM me I'll share a handy link I have on writing a profile
I made a custom palette with the Hue Lights app... Not fully automatic, but just one quick tap at the beginning of each round :)
Definitely a rib, then. Bet Big E backs him into a corner.
Really?  I don't expect hidden flags to appear in my cake slices.  Even if there is reason to.  
Thanks for the advice
It's an old military ammo/brass bag I found at a military surplus store here local. It has a belt loop on the back so I put it around the gray battery bracket. Looks good and I can fit quite a bit in there! I do like the bag on your sissy!
Yes it is supposed to crash.
Yeah, the more I hang out in SRD, the more I go from "Haha, this is great fuckin' popcorn" to "Hoooooooly shit. We need to put these people in some kind of therapy, like, yesterday."
I second this.  Sometimes libraries can get crowded in the summer during heat waves because they have AC, but they still remain pretty quiet and people keep to themselves.  Also, you're pretty close to the Griffith Park area.  There are a lot of nice big parks where you can go be alone.
First season was filmed before 9/11 happened and Fox the TV network (especially back then) has really nothing to do with Fox News cable channel and it's Republican leanings.
K den.
More hysterical, fear-mongering, alarmist horseshit. Antarctic ice is at record levels.
I've talked to other kids. Politely but always firm.  Once at a park there was this sweet single-person merry go-round. My kids wanted to use it but some 5 year old wouldn't give it up. He kept kicking and swinging his legs and screaming that it was his park. After about 10 minutes I figured enough was enough and I walked over and spoke to him.  "Let someone else have a turn" "You need to get off and let someone else ride" And so on until he finally got the message. 
I don't know who to believe. I'm too stupid to know who is the smart one.
33.3%
Anywhere to find the full video of the entire game?
:(
It will be a problem, after all my heart belongs to Libra my husbando ^^^^^^and/u/paper_roses 
Ok thanks let me know :)
Yeah, JoJo anime, for example has censored most of the names for copyrights.
Where did you watch it?
Hey man, I can do this. I actually don't drive though so I don't know how youd like to this, but I would like to see photos of Jigglypuff before anything. Thank you!
Heh I came to post that clippers should have beaten them in 5
Totally dropping a BatDeuce
do u even skate
Yeah. If he'd kept going he might have avoided the train, or just had his tail-end clipped. Hindsight is 20/20.
All jobs are already automated. You can do more with a computer today than 100 workers could do a generation ago - yet somehow we don't have 99% unemployment. This trend will continue just as it has since the invention of the spear replaced teams of hunters driving prey into pits in hunter/gatherer societies.  2030AD? 1000BCE? It's all the same. The trend will continue just as it always has.
Strongbad Dad. 
Sounds good!
A Dutch person watching MLS.... Huh
Strawberry overture and autumn sky - 30/70 - 6mg
I wish Russo worked for WWE, Sheamus would become Shameless Sheamus, he could go around taking upskirt pictures of the divas and stealing people's food.
Repost Cops need to be banned.
The first two Thief games were brilliant. I remember sitting in a darkened room playing those games with surround sound enabled. Super atmospheric and very creepy. 
I have no problem with it being discussed, its just OVER discussed. The CoD community loves to circle jerk and over discuss one subject for a month then move on to the next.
Ok PM'd :)
It seems that there are shitposts either way.   Give a few weeks for the novelty to wear off and I'd bet we'd find that the mods were cultivating resentment more so than than moderating the subreddit. 
Yeah definitely Tucker and Sonja
I can trade :)
...said no one ever. 
I actually just bought it. We'll see if anything changes :o
What kind of beef does Korea have with China other than some minor cultural appropriation outrage?
High art that is exactly what it claims to be. Possibly more honest than the "100% Beef" logo that some fast food chains label on their food wrappers.
Can't agree on so many levels. iso iso iso, we need that space. We need big name players to suck up two at a time and open the lanes. TT doesn't do that, sure he's good for 8 pts and 10 rebounds but he's not spreading the floor.  "All we need is Love...."  da ba da da daaaaa...
I too have one in my thigh. Although I'm looking for it now...can't see it anymore. Shit I've gotten fat.
Tons, if you can think of an overly pretentious motivation.
I think I'd rather die than have her blood in me anyways...
Seems they had time to burn and just let JBL explain the EC to us, something we already have seen for what, 14 years.
My mom had a moth fly in her ear once. Said the sound was unbearable. She went into the hospital and had it blasted out with a water gun. 
I love the color purple so. . .&lt;3 Overall I enjoy the font and it seems simple, but in an elegant style. If you're adding dittos to the list mine will be Korean btw o; 
Even though I'm not opposed to it, alcohol sold at the Magic Kingdom might have made Walt less than happy.
Top lel
No. 
This. I DM and during school and especially the final weeks of the semester it gets a bit too hectic. I'll come over and bring games for the group to play while I do my homework or take time to prepare the adventure for next week.
You are a great parent!! Looks yummy
God damn thank you. I'm amazed at the amount of people suggesting I reconsider. Even if I have one reason to have a kid I still have 10 other reasons not to.
"Break in case of Legacy"?
Maybe the $20 fee is to weed out the creeps.  
I just watched a video and it looks like the stylist has a loaf of white bread.
"Ah. That's never a good idea."
I'm in BC, just outside of Vancouver, working away and having a great time, lots of great hiking trails and fishing spots here, and some nice roads to ride motorbikes on, although nothing like North Antrim country roads unfortunately.
Wasn't able to watch my royals due to little league So I'm watching your game...which is nice actually. And I'll root for you today because you have like a million hits and i like you clevelanders.
I have three eve accounts and i can tell you that /u/macallen is onto the biggest reason we don't have more players in eve:  lack of easy to access content casual friendly content, too many antisocial griefing cuntblisters (see: CODE),   You can still allow freedom and skullduggery without going to far and EVE often goes a little too far.  
Literally too aesthetic to comprehend
I'm surprised you recognized this particular stall.  Impressive memory. 
[FIX]  Without a ~~bad~~ hair day.
My favorite all-time jersey is the [Tony Dorsett super-dark navy with silver numbers](http://www.brennanssports.com/tony-dorsett-autographed-signed-dallas-cowboys-navy-jersey-jsa-witness/). The 33 just pops out at ya. 
Certainly wasn't your well groomed gentleman.
I see. Showing confidence is a bit different than showing you can not be awkward around girls lol. 
Werent angels genderless?
I hear the guys in DV pretty much use Dick and his vision of the team as the epitome of what not to be. They have moved on from what he made it and are a lot more professional now. No clue about vanilla teams, those guys might in fact be a bit more similar since DV has a lot of Delta influence.
Your submission has been automatically removed because it lacks content or a link. If you intended this as a text post, you surely have more on your mind than what you have typed in the comment section. Please correct this and submit your post again. You can [view the subreddit rules here](http://www.reddit.com/r/GlobalOffensive/wiki/rules).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GlobalOffensive) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Hard to link to an ideology. Best I can say is look through mod logs and check what comments he removed and users banned and why.   You may actually have to do some work in this sub for a change, though.
That's a hellofa good start to the BMW family. Welcome!
As the Wild Card entry i believe.
I know you want the game, and it really is an awesome game.  I make this suggestion seriously and hope to not cause offense.  But if you want this game as badly as you suggest, might I suggest finding a job or, if you already work, putting some money aside each payday so that you can get a next-gen system anyway?  It isn't like this problem will get any better for you as time goes on and your current system becomes more and more obsolete.  My two cents.
Yupp! I'm bored of big ships, and there's two new cool little ships coming so I'll be selling off my 200,000,000 credit Clipper to field a fleet of exotically-equipped Diamondbacks, Couriers, Vultures and Vipers. 
Nope i put it in and immediately take it out.
reported 
2003-2004 Orton, 2004-2005 Benjamin and 2011 Rhodes are good ones.
Me too thanks 
Maybe the Samsung Galaxy Alpha but that might be a bit above your budget. It has touchwiz which might suck if you're coming from stock android on your N4.
:/  "My ex at the time wanted to know if I was clean and demanded that he know my sexual history as he didn't like liars and his previous girlfriends had lied to him about being virgins. It was a shitty relationship."
What church?
Methylation can be inherited through epigenetics and affects about 5% of the genome. As for environmental factors - smoking, drinking, junk food, exercise and very importantly stress can all cause methylation.  Cool fact: E. Coli digests foreign DNA and has restriction enzymes that cut it all up, and in order to protect it's own DNA it methylates it.
Hi! Take a look at your link url. This submission has been automatically removed because it is not a direct link. Please submit links ending in .gif, .gifv, .ogg, .mp4, .webm only. If it does not end in the aforementioned, then the submission will be removed from /r/gifs. Thank you. Please review the guidelines in the sidebar about the types of submissions that are appropriate for /r/gifs  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/gifs) if you have any questions or concerns.*
A leatherman. Ok I know it's not like "water" or "friends" but I use it almost every day and has come in handy so many times over the years
Tootsie.
I guess peer groups. The people you're involved with or look up to can have quite a lot of influence on you. In this regard life is somewhat like poker where your friends and family are your cards. If you happen to run into the wrong people while also in a vulnerable state of mind, things are likely to go wrong.  I tend to have a bitter view of parents because I've seen lots of parents mess up but sometimes even the best possible outcome is still a bad one i.e. sometimes things just go wrong no matter what you do. So don't take what I said too seriously.
I have him on my third line with the 90 sce Johnson and sce kucherov and it's the most fun line to play with. Three little speedsters cycling around everyone.
Toilet
Well fuck you too
And then, right afterward in the video...
Kony 2015.....make you so crazy you'll strip naked and masterbate in public 
To think that this is only one of Kittan's badass moments.  Also, even on the rewatch it's hard to stop myself from watching the rest.
It's time boys!
Blow them up.
Probably so.  Two reasons: (1) The state's attorneys office was backlogged at the time and were having important cases thrown out because of speedy trial violations -- so the office would have wanted to get as many dispositions as possible. (2) The case depended on Jay's testimony and no guaranteed that he could was going to be able to keep it together on the witness stand.  Accomplice testimony is always *iffy*.
Why don't you drink tap?
&gt;mfw  http://m.imgur.com/gallery/rZbmFGa
It's not that apparent. Maybe fading the color is a better option? 
Get her a mug. Teachers always need more mugs. 
obviously
I don't believe I need to change the way I have lived for years that has given me no health issues related to this. I don't feel like drinking, I don't. I will not go out of my way to do so and be uncomfortable just because reddit's worried about my perfect health.
WHO NEEDS GAME WHEN YOU ZOMBIE ANIMATIONS
I'm more interested in not spending the time digging up a link than I am having you believe me. It's something she had stated repeatedly.  If I come across it I'll send it your way.
Our right wing press is very vocal here - and foreign media tends to focus on the extremes.   For example if you look at the coverage we see from the USA it's usually Fox News making a pigs ear of anything they touch.  It's been politically easy not to say nice things about Europe. I know for a fact that happens in France - back in the 90s the UK and France would abuse each other in the press because it suited everybody.  However with the referendum coming in the next couple of years then we will for once get a positive view on the EU and not just the usual negative one. That may change things.
&gt; I've done it for 4 years of my life  Ahhh, now I think I understand. Are you salty because someone stole your Sonic original fan character? Or did someone criticize your Harry Potter X Power Rangers fan fiction?   Seriously though, I'm not a fan of fan-fiction and have never read a piece in my life, but it takes all kinds to make a world, so just let them have their fun. Fan-fiction isn't hurting anyone, it's just people writing for fun or to improve their writing, who cares if it is shit? I can't understand why someone would get so upset over something so harmless. 
Nerua *can* be scouted now, I saw someone find her the other day. I'd pick Mikael since based on your team, you'll need someone who can push the ball from back to mid and Yuri shouldn't be the one who has to do that because she's so fragile and you're maxing her passives anyways.
Get a hotel, motel, airbnb, take an uber if you're drunk. It's not my alley, and believe me I'm not on a high horse. Everyone in the neighborhood was not happy with it. Black, white, PR, and everyone else who lives there. That shit is disrespectful to the neighborhood. Fuck outta here with that bs. 
I was a bit disappointed with his production at the beginning of the series but holy shit did he step up. 5 pts in the conference final including a goal in both elimination games. He's definitely getting hot at the right time!
Arma fo shooo
[boulder in a swamp](http://media.giphy.com/media/tGt6VWwdQm3gA/giphy.gif)
HA. Nice...  Just for a few of us.
I hooked up with a girl who I honestly found to be a bit annoying in normal conversation, mainly because it was mutually agreed that it was a one-time thing and I really wanted to hook up with someone that night. She ended up talking to a bunch of people about sleeping with me, making conversations with those people rather awkward for a time. Honestly, even just for a hook up, I'd advise sticking with people that you get along with well in a normal conversation setting, simply because you tend to communicate with and understand those people better.
:D
**skimhaze** (Mage, Paladin, Warlock) vs. **ToTheDetail** (Warrior, Warlock, Mage)  **Round 1:** ToTheDetail(Warrior **WINNER**) vs. skimhaze(Mage)  **Round 2:** ToTheDetail(Mage **WINNER**) vs. skimhaze(Paladin)  **Round 3:** ToTheDetail(Warlock) vs. skimhaze(Warlock **WINNER**)  **Round 4:** ToTheDetail(Warlock **WINNER**) vs. skimhaze(Mage)  **WINNER - ToTheDetail 3-1**  Great games to both players! Looking forward to reffing in the future!
The argument is not that God is the uncreated thing, but that the uncreated thing is God. As should be clear from the dialogue in [*Laws X*](http://classics.mit.edu/Plato/laws.10.x.html):  &gt;Ath. If we were to see this power existing in any earthy, watery, or fiery substance, simple or compound-how should we describe it? &gt;Cle. You mean to ask whether we should call such a self-moving power life?   &gt; Ath. I do.   &gt;Cle. Certainly we should.   &gt;Ath. And when we see soul in anything, must we not do the same-must we not admit that this is life?   &gt;Cle. We must.   &gt;Ath. Then characters and manners, and wishes and reasonings, and true opinions, and reflections, and recollections are prior to length and breadth and depth and strength of bodies, if the soul is prior to the body.   &gt;Cle. To be sure.   Thus does Plato argue that there must be some first self-moving principle, and that it must have the attributes of mind (wishes, reasonings, reflections, etc). To pull from other philosophers, "this everyone understands to be God."
&gt; Supposedly he has been involved in finding long entrenched corruption within the vatican bank which hasn't been winning him friends.  Which is what the PR statements all say. But considering the guys history he's more likely to be working for the mafia than against them.
It's actually unique, which is good, I just wish it wasn't so slow-going. Maybe add a speed option?
Damn these people have the patience 
about a week.  it started on the 28th.
Not enough lube?
strat roulette 
Skinny, cowboy hat wearing Bradshaw always looks weird to me.
Alright thanks for replying :)
Thanks for the tip! If you don't mind, are there any other characters other than my mains who are a good matchup against ZSS?
Except Jack didn't kill his wife.
I really believe this PPV is set up to kick off a hot angle.
Your submission has been removed because it is lacking a correct tag. All prompt submissions to /r/WritingPrompts must include, in their title, a tag in square brackets. Please repost your prompt with the correct tag. The sidebar contains the list of tags that can be used.  If you are unsure of how to tag a prompt, consult [How to Tag Prompts](/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/how_to_tag_prompts). If this prompt has been flagged in error, please message the moderators using the link below.  ---   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/WritingPrompts) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Definitely not "shat". 
I did. What do you mean by step up? 
Instead of like an NBA Finals preview week during the downtime we've had an offseason /r/nba preview.
i was one of the first to order, and I received all my stuff. 
I want much much more of you 
Sure! I'll add you too.
Or exactly how the us government is designed to work. 
I'm in the UK and in our final year we actually did have personal finance classes where we learned about budgeting and similar things. And you know what no one takes these classes seriously, there's no exam at the end so no one cares. That's the mentality of the majority from my experience.  I see where you're coming from though but at the end of the day schools just want to make their own numbers look better. 99% of their focus at sixth form is to get you to university because it makes them look better the more people that go to uni form their school.
oh yeah i bet that bacon snaps real gooood. that looks tasty
I may not be depressed, but spiritbx's comment gave me cancer. 
He is truly the greatest RS player of our time
Carve on a mountain, 'the Doctor was here'
Always sexy ;)
Go on official Ukrainian website and you will see that Saakashvilli is a regional governor, its not even hidden. Ukr government is proud of it. Im from Odessa, and although I dont live there currently, I still have a bunch of family there. What happened in Odessa on May 2 was organized by Kiev as Odessa is a very Russian city, as the rest of the South-East of Ukraine. You want proof? Why dont you get you ass up off the coach and instead of asking for proof, fly out to Ukraine (I did couple of months ago) and speak to so-called separatists or supposed Russian soldiers fighting and killing so-called Ukrainians.  So, i hope that answers your question about 'who would dress up' as Russians- Russian people by ethnic and cultural rights! Its Ukraine that has occupied these territories, not the other way around.   You cant call someone separatists when they live and protect their own land, language, culture, family and the right to live. 
I10 maybe? No luck in J10 so far
*She laughs.* Okay.
Everyone knows oil spills are bad. That's not the issue in question, is it?  It's not tu quoque if the hypocrite *is* the proposed alternative. Then it's perfectly relevant to examine that alternative.
It looks like Floppy is holding his stick or whatever with his right hand?  Can anyone confirm? Cause I believe Amon lost his right arm.
Eu acho que o problema é a relação entre alta carga horária de trabalho e poder de compra, ninguém quer dar o sangue pela empresa trabalhando 9h (ou mais em muitos casos) por dia para no fim de mês ganhar 2 salários mínimos. Já estive nessa situação e é horrível.
&gt; Foundation Advancing Creation Truth, or FACT.  Haha, that's adorable.  &gt; "We mention complexity and design, but we stay away from any discussion of the Bible for public school tours. We understand that our signage refers to special Creation and the biblical timeline, but we don't draw attention to those signs for public school tours."  I'm going to go with "Bullshit" on that one.  Now cue whiny oppressed and persecuted Christians.
They turned all the 1.0 underwear in to armor pieces. If you want to change your underwear then just equip those? All the 1.0 versions were just palate swaps.
Points a bit invalidated by the fact that I corrected a second later. Kind of reinforced by it, really. 
That's why advances are sometimes creepy, even if he's cute. [This post always stuck with me as a great explanation of what creepiness is and what makes someone creepy.](https://www.reddit.com/r/cringepics/comments/21gf9b/i_get_more_pussy_than_u_ever_will/cgd2x3b)   The short version of the post is the equation:   Creepiness = ( (Awkwardness x Forwardness) / (Attractiveness) )^Persistence  [This is the equation in a more readable picture form](http://i.imgur.com/iGhOI0q.gif)
I know. A lot of people call him Kwe though. I'm not sure which one he's more partial to.
Dennis Knight, this is your chance!
During basic training I had an infection on the top of my forarm. Medic lance it and pulled out an old broken piece of toothpick. It was from many years earlier when my younger brother and I would have toothpick fights like knife fights. 
Yes.  I see this too.  All the time.  ALL... the time.
If he feels he needs space while he seeks help, it's best to grant it to him. As long as he's aware that you still care about him, and are willing to talk as soon as he feels ready, that's all you can do.
Well he's better than Fabinho and maybe could still release the Kraken here or there, not sure if he'd be worth the DP money he'd try to get
I love the title... and Jon Snow. &lt;3
Found Hank Schrader
Just tuned in, anything of note occur in the pre-show?
I have a friend who switched to a Dolphins fan. He likes them because he likes marine life. My Chargers friend deemed his reasoning invalid. This discussion comes up often, and hilarity always ensues.
I also made the mistake of overbuying with Descent, and it make it so much harder to play. First of all giving the players too many combo choices right off the bat (which allowed them to min/max to the point where as Overlord I was doomed from the start on almost every encounter) - as well as just making it too fiddly.  If I was starting again (and I am), I am starting with the core set, and playing with the Co-Op Adventures in order. They are great and can be replayed several times without feeling too repetitive - then you move onto the next one.  They have also prioritized my painting order, because I know what Monsters I will need for each one.
That's probably a lie, they know what it is but would rather feign not knowing it.
me neither.  i went outside and zip tied myself to try this and inadvertently made myself a prime target for a kidnapping.  i think all they want is money so it's not as bad as it could be.  
It also would have been the coolest Easter egg from the AtLA series (other than the picture of Aang bending the marbles, haha)
"F-*beep*-K YOU!"
Are you on?
It's set to 9:41? I had no idea, never paid attention. If it's that oddly specific it's probably something company-lore related.
Wait...  No it's not...  http://imgur.com/kDcGOsw
**What is your Minecraft username:** Serz_ **How old are you:** 18 How long have you been playing Minecraft: About 4 years now, I would say. **Do you accept our rules:** Yes indeed! **What type of player are you:** I like to build and explore. Mostly build. I try to make anything I create look aesthetically pleasing, even if it's just a small mine entrance. **What can you offer to our community:** Hopefully I can offer some nice additions to the map, and help others with their own projects! **Any questions of clarification:** None! I look forward to being a part of this community.  
i just read way too much about sex. also, funniest book ever is the world history of the condom. "The Humble Little Condom". Origami ones from ancient japan are the best. bang her with your dragon.... literally!
Naxx is guaranteed value with a bunch or enabling cards. Packs are random. Look at the cards from the wing and look at how many decks use them. 
So if I don't see Hola in the properties section then I'm in the clear? I only had the chrome extension, which I've uninstalled,  and my malware scan came back clean, should I be okay?
By the time they touch the blue line part of their hitbox is likely to be inside the real indicator anyway.
Maybe they'll perform The Powers That B and Government Plates stuff first and work their way back. That could be pretty neat
Sign up for Credit Karma, its free and it'll let you know where you stand credit wise (roughly anyway). It will also offer you credit cards that you're more likely to get approved for. 
http://i.imgur.com/2WxOTrF.jpg
Civi uses the friends feature?
I carry digital copies of the classic films *Batman: Year One*, *Superfights*, and *DoggieWoggiez! PoochieWoochiez! All Dogs On Tour!* on my person at all times, viewable on my DS lite
Where the hell did it go human? 
Fuel Part 3 - drive around the circumference of the map edition (it's never too early to ask for more fuel!)
Ponytail and new shirt.
Tag match higher in the card. Wut.
I don't appreciate your tone. That you have wasted $12,000,000 in taxpayer and other dollars while collecting a CFO's salary, isn't a testiment to hemp.   A researcher in Sweeden conducted many tests on unprocessed hemp in hempcrete. The material was roughly equivalent to that composed of processed hemp shiv.   While you say that a plant can't meet all the variety of uses, we are currently failing at incorporating the by-products as is. Most of Canada's hemp production is for seed plants. The tech for processing seeds is cheap. The current market for oil and hemp flour has been pretty steady. A seed plant and a CBD rich plant are not mutually exclusive. What is exclusionary is legislation. You can't harvest the CBD because it's classified as a regulated substance, it's illegal.   A farmer growing hemp loses out on the CBD potential as well as the shiv potential. Hemp shiv is not available on the Canadian market. A friend just built a hempcrete house and had to import from Denmark. When I say shiv is not available, I'm a university researcher and I can't legally access any. But I can buy weed anywhere.   As for use of fertilizers, organic hemp is worth far more in Canada and almost all of ours is certified organic.   Hemp's immediate future is in building material, biocomposites, energy, supplementary organic material, organic foods, cosmetics and medicine. None of these require fibre plants. But all of them have fibre.  The processing of fibre is really something that should happen as it becomes the last wast by-product of hemp, not as its primary resource.
You forgot the RAM.  Here's a build with an Intel processor that's going to outperform the build you posted for a slightly lower price  [PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/FfJGYJ) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/FfJGYJ/by_merchant/)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [Intel Core i5-4690K 3.5GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80646i54690k) | $229.99 @ SuperBiiz  **CPU Cooler** | [Phanteks PH-TC12DX 68.5 CFM CPU Cooler](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/phanteks-cpu-cooler-phtc12dx) | $47.99 @ Newegg  **Motherboard** | [ASRock Z97 EXTREME4 ATX LGA1150 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asrock-motherboard-z97extreme4) | $128.95 @ OutletPC  **Memory** | [Team Elite Plus 8GB (1 x 8GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/team-memory-tpd38g1600c1101) | $44.99 @ Newegg  **Storage** | [OCZ ARC 100 120GB 2.5&amp;quot; Solid State Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/ocz-internal-hard-drive-arc10025sat3120g) | $59.99 @ Amazon  **Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 1TB 3.5&amp;quot; 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st1000dm003) | $48.75 @ OutletPC  **Video Card** | [Zotac GeForce GTX 970 4GB Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/zotac-video-card-zt9010110p) | $310.95 @ B&amp;amp;H  **Case** | [NZXT Source 210 Elite (Black) ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/nzxt-case-s210e001) | $43.99 @ SuperBiiz  **Power Supply** | [SeaSonic S12II 520W 80+ Bronze Certified ATX Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seasonic-power-supply-s12ii520bronze) | $58.99 @ SuperBiiz  **Monitor** | [Asus VG248QE 144Hz 24.0&amp;quot; Monitor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asus-monitor-vg248qe) | $249.99 @ Micro Center   | *Prices include shipping, taxes, rebates, and discounts* |  | **Total** | **$1224.58**  | Generated by [PCPartPicker](http://pcpartpicker.com) 2015-05-31 19:58 EDT-0400 |  You'll notice that I removed the optical drive- it's not needed to install Windows (you can do that from a flash drive), and almost every game available can be found as a download rather than a disk.
get used to the scope, once you get headshot area down then practice the trick to avoid the bolt action, it can be hard in hectic fights  tap reload, sprint forward, then ADS
One of the rare scenarios when knockback II is actually helpful.
Upper Fox connects green Bay and Winnebago. Lower Fox starts around Milwaukee and goes into Illinois. They're not connected at all, I believe. 
http://steamcommunity.com/id/thebman712 im willing to try and help you by playing with you, although i am still only a nova 3 myself, but i can help 
I see. Thank you, I'll probably skip those for now!
"Wow, those people on the screen are so loud, I can hardly hear you talking."
Wanna provide actual sources for that?
Was it 1975 when this happened?
Google started hard mode?
Agreed. If we want to talk about GOAT I think one also has to look at what they worked with. LeBron carrying this Cavs team with injured Love and Irving has to mean alot more than winning with a fully loaded healthy roster. Not to mention how much winning it all in a small market franchise would be worth. 
...Until the end of the episode, where he takes brocks spot as gym leader and raises his children like he was supposed to.   also he wasn't a criminal, he was just too embarrassed to return to his family.
The fuck? How desperate for money do you have to be? 
bosses flee when they reach a certain amount of health, you have to find them again.
I'm still on my search for a Stormy Grey minus the gold.
that's right batmanspiderman96
Riots and martial law.
Boba, nice! I've been looking.
we glued my eyelids closed and that was crazy. I was like, 'You gotta get me soap, this is not gonna work.'
Holy shit this is so true.
Batteries in but I do use a ten port power brick   http://i.imgur.com/XGH2XoJ.jpg
vague reporting, so if there is one, he can claim he got the break on the story or just say it was Thibs all along...
He was the first one on and took this before the other two people got on board.
Lol
Fair enough :P
I honestly don't know at this point. My point is every tournament brings new surprises and shows talent of a lot of players. I just can't think, currently, who really is the "best".
I've said it before, the creepiness of a gesture is inversely proportional to the recipient's interest in the person gesturing.
If my grandmother had wheels she would have been a bike
 Even if it was genuine, having a debate between depravity and semi-decency isn't serious.
I tried the test. Charged the tank up to 60 PSI, then I took the line off between the compressor and the tank and it held at 60 PSI. So I think based on that the check valve is probably ok.
I did, don't worry.  I am a little salty and pretty aggro right now, (external stuff, not because of your comment) I should have edited my language.  I'll quote you and then breakdown what I take issue with in your thought process.  &gt;I said I am tired of people using this sub for money. This includes voting rings and handing over disproportionate power to moderators who then act as gatekeepers.   Obviously I'm with you on this one. Voting rings are dumb, the people can and should decide what content belongs on the frontpage, it shouldn't just get hive-minded up there by having a super positive rating when it comes out of the new queue.  &gt;Reddit was once about people just sharing cool stuff that they thought others would enjoy. Nowadays it's used more and more as a platform to make money.   I take issue with this. Whenever you link to somewhere on the internet someone is making money off of that. Page views, ad revenue, whatever. The big difference here is that if you don't post your own content you are relying on blind luck to have any chance of being posted, and you have no control over the time of posting or the title.  A few years back when the sub was smaller and there was less content my friend and I would make a video once every week or so. We would usually make it to the top 10 or so even though the videos weren't especially good (I was pretty proud at the time, but looking back it was pretty cringey). The difference between a [good title](http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/smgpc/league_of_noire_the_carrying/) and a [bad one](http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/usgpw/new_quality_discourse_4man_premade/) can make your hours of hard work feel worth it, or make it feel like a complete waste. I don't want a lot. I don't want to be the next pewdiepie, or dunkey, or whoever, but I would like to be able to recoup licensing costs and I for sure would like to take myself out for a nice dinner to celebrate.  Really though, I just want people to see what I made, and reddit's suspicion of OC creators makes that very hard.  &gt;The strict rules on this sub encourages such content.  No, they really don't I've had problems in other subs of videos being pulled from the number one spot because we toed the line with some of their rules, and it's no different here. Moderation doesn't help content creators. If a video fails because it isn't good (or sometimes just bad luck) that's fine, but heavy moderation is just as restrictive to people who like to make content as it is to people who simply want to view content.  Sorry for the wall of text, if you don't agree with me that's fine, but I just wanted to explain my point of view better.
Ain't a person in the world who can resist the allure of light Justin bieber
RIP eardrums.
I think it's straight back for N, then kinda to the right and back for low range.  You're doing this while stopped?  
Have you read much about how many receivers you guys are planning on taking? I know you already have several WR commits and didn't know how hard you were pushing for [Freddie Pinder](http://247sports.com/Player/Freddie-Pinder-58525), who our staff is apparently going after pretty hard. 
Engineer here. Exactly how do you expect that display to work?
I think you can save and quit, beat the dragons, and all the chests will be closed again.
Thirded. My favorite spot in town. 
Haters gotta hate. 
I like to cull fast and hard with Machine Cult, then go hard into Trade Federation for survival and Blob for damage. Game needs combos, so you basically have to go Red.
have you ever heard of people liking inanimate objects? Sometimes wires get crossed. I feel like if someone is willing to say they're a "non-practicing pedophile" its either a troll, or someone who had wires crossed and now has a paraphilia. If they don't act on it, good for them! My god, we know they exist, let's not make it a hard thing for them to talk about or seek help for.  I think that will just make it worse. 
Wait, rude people on the internet? Never heard that one before ..... We can't control how people act online, just ignore rude comments and keep going.
Nope someone with no hype but he'll bring the pain. 
Rock star.
You won't get hurt from haste2 lapsing.
we are still getting the Freedom act, so letting Patriot expire was pointless.
Damn you're pretty.
I've been *very* impressed with navi in the qualifiers actually. If they get into TI I still don't think they will break top 8, but there is no doubt they have had the most interesting matches this qualifier.
Lavonte David is better.
I don't follow what you're saying about the deductible. Traditional is tax-defferred, so you don't pay taxes on it at the end of the year. It isn't a deduction, it shows up in box 3 of the w-2 but not box 1. As far as the federal government is concerned it's like you never made the money in the first place. It counts as income the year you take the money out. If it's Roth it counts as income now and not the year you take it out. Neither are deductions, and neither pay capital gains tax.   Please let me know more about this tax deduction of 5500, as far as I know it doesn't exist but if it does I will try to take advantage of it   The 401k limit is now 18k, raised last year. The limit applies to your contribution only. Employer match is on top of that.
I canceled 15 minutes ago I'll cancel again and try
This is exactly why you don't sleep with your foot hanging over the side of the bed. That poor guy looked so sad and there was nothing he could do about it :(
not my own name bro! lol
LOLOLOL the stories I could tell you. Yeah, it's not something I ever plan on trying again. Ever. Even with just soju i'm not sure how you guys manage it. I've seen you guys double fist/triple and quadruple shot without being able to breathe. I never know if I should leave comments saying good job or please don't hurt yourselves!
Setting statistics aside, it is likely that no player has ever given more of a shit about maxing his potential as a basketball player. If there is some limit to the amount of time and effort a human can realistically devote to developing his basketball skills, he has to be near it.
I envy Player 2.
Directed by Michael Bay.
All I got from that was that destiny awaits the new intercontinental tag team champions
Particularly silly is the moralizing tone applied to the telling of a very specific story as if it can be applied more generally. I mean it's simple, everyone needs to have wealthy parents who aren't dysfunctional and willing to have you live at home. Make sure you don't have too many siblings that can suck up resources. Sort of go to uni,  but mainly just work. Call it giving up luxuries.  I'm not picking on this guy. Good on him, he's taken opportunities given to him. But for the author to pretend what this guy did is somehow applicable to everyone else is silly. This guy has got lucky with who gave birth to him. All the full time grocery workers that work along side him and don't have the privilege of living with their parents are obviously not has hard working and not giving up on as many luxurious as this guy.
Thank you for that tip :D
You can add me: illini1022 or post psn and I'll invite. 
34 sunboy. Send me an inv: bleeepbloop
[Here's mine](http://i.imgur.com/FdhFZ9F.jpg)
I could make this amount for the rest of my life,  if I wanted to.  I'm trying to climb the ladder while I'm young and physically able.  Risk tolerance,  low to medium for now. And,  I was thinking within a year or two. 
Juggernaut is not in any top-tier decklists, and I doubt there will be any popular netdecks that contain it. On that grounds, you could dust it.  HOWEVER, If you wanted to throw it in a deck, control warrior would be the most likely archetype. Games can go long, making chance to draw the mine high. As a 6-mana, 5 health creature, it would most likely replace either Sylvannas or ~~Iron~~ Shield Maiden.  On replacing Sylvannas, I find that in a lot of cases, her deathrattle doesn't get much benefit. Usually my opponnent would do a suboptimal trade to make me get nothing, put a lot of small, usless stuff on the board, or would have a way to straight up remove it. In these situations, IJ could be better (unlikely, but possible).  On replacing Shield Maiden, yes sometimes that 5 armor is extremely useful with shield slam, but if you are facin a lot of control, IJ could be better. Control v control games usually result in the warrior having a LOT of armor anyway. In these cases, you can look at it as shield maiden heals you for 5 making a 5 health differential between you and your opponent. Iron Juggernaut's mine does 10 damage, making a 10-health differential. In a control heavy meta where both players draw most of their decks, IJ replacing one of the Shieldmaidens is a valid choice.  All in all, if I were to open an IJ, I would keep it because sometimes it's fun using surprise cards.
Enjoy it whilst it lasts!
Sounds like elitist b.s. to me. I did a bunch of work on my bike last summer. I lost a good number of riding days doing stuff that a trained and qualified mechanic could have done in a day or 2. Not worth it. I'd rather be riding than mechanic-ing.
He needs to get a job first. You won't be able to get them in any other way. And unfortunately it probably needs to be for at least 1-3 years because they checked my W-4's for the past 3 years for my Fiance.
I suppose that explains why Keanu is narrating.
&gt; No, because I don't start from the outright stupid assumption that both views are equally reasonable and that we should expect to see a 50/50 split.   Well let's keep in mind where this started. You said you don't trust *today's* philosophers. But it's not 50/50 split. Only a quarter of today's philosophers are moral subjectivists. More than half of today's philosophers are moral objectivsts, which is twice the number of moral subjectivists.   &gt; You are here using the term "philosophy" ambiguously. I am there referring to the study of philosophy as a formal academic discipline, not to the informal consideration of philosophical questions by individuals.  If anybody was using it ambiguously it was you, but my point still stands either way.   &gt; The question I raised is about whether academics are doing a good job helping people towards that end or not.  Well considering that the majority of philosophers are moral objectivists it doesn't seem the study of philosophy leads many people to reject the idea that there is a real right and wrong
Golly gee willickers, Batman, did I fuckin ask you?
Car shows.  Oh... Now I'm sad. 
&gt; If Nina Dobrev in a little black dress comes up to me in a bar and starts grinding on me and shoving her tongue down my throat, I will be genuinely ok with that  Unlikely.  You'd probably be wondering why a gorgeous actress so far out of your league is suddenly grinding on you and trying to eat your face.  Either situation is a mental c-c-c-ombo breaker because they're both highly unexpected events and your brain would probably wonder if you're being set up or something else.  My prediction is that in both situations you would bail out or freeze up, had you not been able to think about them in advance.
Okay. I've watched YuYu way too many times so I should spit it pretty quickly haha.
When this indestructible ship set sail, it went somewhere no ship has ever gone before!
Tamriel
I tried online, it seems they're out of stock of codes.
This is the only acceptable reason to trade Sura.  Not to get a chip. To get Sheed.
That's already the case (JTR §5452), and in fact they even limit it to single DLA, not DLA w/ dependents.
HBK almost too Shane's head off with that punch. 
Yeah you guys just have a 40% student passing rate. Sounds much better 😏
I have done this response like 5 times now.  Gone point by point, only to deleted it because the simplest fact is we see Trek Different.  Agree to disagree is where we will have to end.  Know that I understand your arguments and it infuriates me that you aren't wrong.  I don't feel that I am wrong though either. (I kept trying to put more justifications for why I am right here but finally realized I need to let it go.)  So from one stranger on the internet, I appreciate the time you took on these responses.  Live long and prosper fellow Trek Fan.
Did you use a reference photo?
Oh okay, thanks for clarifying 
So right.
Leenas up there
wha... oh. [gotcha](http://vignette2.wikia.nocookie.net/mkwikia/images/8/8b/Johnny_Cage_MK1_Victory.gif/revision/latest?cb=20121217004447)
Rome v Boudicca  Holocaust series Alexander the Great conquests  Much more on the Assyrians Maybe an episode or two on the forgotten war (Korea)
&gt; but I'd procrastinated for too long and they were due.  Is it possible the essays were garbage because the girl didn't have enough time to do a decent job?
"mini"
Yeah, that's exactly how Cormier vs Hendo played out. 
How did you get your hands on it?
There are private server implementations currently in development. I don't know the compatibility of them with the current version of the client.
scary right?
I understand about curiosity. Alas, this thread is /r/legaladvice, not /r/satisfymycuriosity.
970 destroys 1080p.. its borderline overkill (for now at least)
do not engage, repeat, do NOT engage
Could you please give me a rough figure of how much these meals cost you per meal?
Give them this SKU: 1375009 and have them look it up in the system. Good luck
Thanks! 318.8%
That's one of the things I really like about this movie. From the first movie on, we've all heard how the raptors are supposed to be very fast hunters, yet we never really see them do much fast hunting. From what I recall, all the kills we see on screen are stealth campers.
Typically Walmart owns the property their stores are on. But this one being closed for 3-4 years who knows if it was sold. 
Trying to hide those cracks, without telling them is such a weak move. All season she just lies and trys to hope no one notices her massive mistakes and never admits to them.
Stop hating on Libertas please.
Yeah, spot on with a lot of those examples. Almost all the little clever, funny or endearing things that Jamie and Claire do and say are left out of the show. This particularly stood out to me because I was reading the book after binge watching all the episodes of season 1b (hadn't read it in a long while and had forgotten a lot of details which the show obviously didn't help much with...) prior to the finale. I guess overall Jamie and Claire both seem dumbed down, clumsier, and less compelling to me. Thank god they're so good looking or I don't know if I would have made it.
It does. Neat!
They do have a nice spread on Sunset. Too many questions, not enough answers
My thought exactly. I would assume that it got caught on something in the wash and just tighten the straps. Also, you can feel the netal/plastic piece to know it is too far down.
Jurassic bark...nough said.  ;-(
We have 3 and are at deathsimger CP! Message blondyness
alright mayne, hope you feel better
Have some French fag get out and walk on it, then we'll be impressed
&gt; Is it wrong of me to expect people to actually race in a "racing game mode".  It's like getting pissed people use red shells in mario kart.  Yes it's wrong of you to expect people to not bump you when bumping is so heavily rewarded in the game.  If you don't like it only do contactless.
I still don't think this is enough, if I'm following you completely.  Say f(x) = 1/2 erfc(-A/sqrt(2)).  You need more than to be able to say whether f(A)&lt;X.  You need generate X in a way that's fine enough so that it's possible you might get f(A)&lt;X&lt;f(B).  If your method of generating X will never produce numbers in that range, then it isn't helping you guess with better than 50% chance.  I could even tell you f(A) is .5, and |f(A)-f(B)|&lt;2^-N for some large N.  Now you have no way of knowing how many digits of X you need to generate to even potentially put it in that range with any probability.  It basically becomes a game of who picked the bigger N.
Yea. I could probably pull off a 3oz. Ours are two. We are getting new cups anyway so I suppose I could propose we find some three oz ones specifically for macchiatos, cortados, and con panna. Does that sound like a good size for those types of drinks? Right now we have all these sample cups from all these manufacturers to play around with and there are a surprising variety of sizes.
Which one's which?
What island?!
I'm glad you made it. How are things now?   I went through depression and suicidal thoughts and had some near-misses whilst drinking. Glad I found a better way of being.
Tequila by The Champs
If that's the case, then I don't care how anyone refers to Satan.
Imports 1/2 off Thursday and Sunday night!
I think if we move Markstrom one of the first things Benning will work on is getting Lack re-signed come July 1st.
My personal opinion based on just the look alone is Asa butterfield. He's just got that snarky kid feel. 
I think he means the Abaya.
You know what I'm really tired of? People calling him the antichrist for doing things like this. 
"Why can't you just hold down the button, hold your phone out and be done with it?"  If Siri were configured to identify songs just by holding down the home button, then it wouldn't work the other 99% of the time when you want to give it a command.   Try thinking these things through before publicly posting your wild conspiracy theories.
Damn, that's so cool! You should sell these!!  Do you have any plans/drawings for it? :)
C'mon guy, Freddy?  
Maybe a stupid question. When a white blood cell finds a parasite, how does it let other white blood cells know? Is there any communication or do the cells find them all on their own?
**I** ***SAID,*** `tone: friendly`**, SIR.**  lol nah, I just figure people who use cool turns of phrase like "shoo-in" probably are the type to want to use the correct spelling. "Toe the line" is another common one. I really appreciated your comment.  "supposed" though *ducks*
Mind you he's stuck there... from the first blue move of the mission, so umm.. yeah avoid that spot folks, can't grapple out.  Edit: Entirely reproducible at that
I find that super unlikely. WWE ruined all segments with him since December trying to get him over. They won't bother to turn him heel now. 
75th minute, just watched it on MLS Live replay
Looks like the car is doing an [actual barrel roll](http://i.imgur.com/f8yCFyK.png)
That's a great question, and I was wondering the exact same thing while I was watching it.
What the fuck is wrong with you? 
My favorite part was when he passed the motorcycle while going around a blind corner and almost hit that truck head on.
Yes
but most guys would love to have a pair to play with :) does that make us weird?
The D in that game was even more impressive.  Steve Smith came into the game having caught for more than 1500 yards in the regular season and 300 yards in the two previous playoff games.  The Hawks triple teamed him almost all game and held him to just 33 yards receiving.  With Smith shut down Carolina was unable to get any offense going in the game.
okay, and?
http://csgostash.com/collection/The+Rising+Sun+Collection
Aye, I think that would be fun. I'm not 100% sure how to avoid someone making a bot to play the game or something. I know I probably won't get to it anytime soon, but it would be really fun to see. And of course I'd help fund it.
Beautiful pussy very hot with the wetness. 
Yea i was expecting incredible results with what I was reading. 
I'm glad you put the hair thing in the title, because I wouldn't have noticed anything other than what's between your chin and bust line.  10/10 would ogle again.
Care to explain why?
CS:GO   Edit: minecraft?
Thank you, I figured I knew IED but I couldn't figure out what the VB was for.
Carnivale
pls teach me your psychic ways
Source: [Hico Supercell // V3](https://500px.com/photo/110516801?utm_campaign=bot&amp;utm_content=botcomment&amp;utm_medium=web&amp;utm_source=reddit) by [Kelly DeLay](https://500px.com/kellydelay?utm_campaign=bot&amp;utm_content=botcomment&amp;utm_medium=web&amp;utm_source=reddit) on [500px.com](https://500px.com?utm_campaign=bot&amp;utm_content=botcomment&amp;utm_medium=web&amp;utm_source=reddit).  Request for [RF License](https://prime.500px.com/photos/110516801?utm_campaign=bot&amp;utm_content=botcomment&amp;utm_medium=web&amp;utm_source=reddit).
Really , watch it here and now or later on here http://www.twitch.tv/queuetimes/profile/past_broadcasts or here http://queuetimes.com/ or here http://strangetalesfromouterspace.podbean.com/ Not to mention their YouTube channel here https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC2maXXS1zBv8QVyb3UmkqUg/feed These guys know their stuff . In my opinion the best WildStar podcast around ! Enjoy :-D
kek
The good Nickelodeon.  Rocko's Modern Life, Rugrats, Hey Arnold, Are You Afraid of the Dark, Legends of the Hidden Temple, GUTS, Wild and Crazy Kids, What Would You Do, Double Dare....gah I could go on and on.  So many great days were spent running around outside and then crashing in front of the TV.
X Files drop in quality towards the end was huge.
I'd like this but only if it was done by a secondary team or studio. I mean, Jak and Daxter was great, but Uncharted was fantastic, and The Last of Us was mindblowingly amazing. I couldn't have Jak and Daxter take time or resources from either of those or a new IP.
I'm not truly impressed until someone flies it upside down to dry their field
What's the military law about shooting a guy without warning in his head when he is disarmed  but preparing a booby trap ?  interesting i think
I like the musicality of the piece, but I can't quite tell what it's about. Why'd you choose not to title it?
Your weed one was spot on for like 75 percent of stoners, but there are those who could be baked but you would never guess it. My eyes never get red when I smoke. 
It's been 20 minutes over here and I'm still cringing
めっちゃいい
I'll try that thanks for the suggestion but another thing is it seems to be the worst when my tank is idle or even sideways 
Should have = should've, which sounds like should of
Boats revenant alt is now actually on top of the MOA killboards by a huge margin
:D
Hello, just happened to find your thread here. Didn't know you were also twitching. Very very much respect your game on PS. GL on 2.5/5!
"God" made you this way.  Isn't it a little disrespectful of her to insult God's work? 
Was going to say this. But I've found if you don't watch it for a few years you forget stuff and then it's fun to watch again. 
My penis has been in your daughter's mouth.
I think the reason why Lapis wanted them to surrender might be similar to why you might try to convince someone that fighting a train head on isn't a good idea. It'd very likely save their lives. Or at least, make them have an easier fate when captured, which they were instantly, despite trying to fight. 
This is good advice. If you don't mind passing up the xp, selling items like crushbone belts and orc scalps from orcs in gfay around level 5-10 is a great source for quick plat.  On ragefire I see people buying stacks of scalps for 6 or 7pp, and CB belts usually go for around 1pp each.
Planning on sharing the wealth OP?
8 months and this is your very first comment?. . . .
....oh goddammit..
NASCAR didn't invent either the HANS or the SAFER barriers. The former was an SCCA roadracing innovation, the later, INDYCAR. 
Playing the game should be incentive enough to show up. If people are skipping out regularly unless you penalize them on XP, you might want to explore why they're skipping some sessions.
That is a ram
i only came back in late 2013 after a decade . is this the first elimation chamber to not have the main title involved?
Something something broken arms.
Making friends/being sociable. \^.^
You bastard 
Invite GH05T FaCEZz
*GET HIM!*
brock goes in the MITB. wins
fair enough
Sorry judging from the samsung website, it doesn't appear to be
The #prowalk #devilnax dream just died. :'(
What about the priest with the oranges? That guy was awesome. 
BORK IS BACK
Please wait... Normally they take quite some time especially since for this event they have to verify that you played all
Looks like there is some walking room compared to last year.
My problem is that it's basically a job-type game.  I loved casually cutting down trees with friends and slowly building our small settlement until one day I log in and see that most of the valuables were stolen and I can't even track the thief. Not enough skill points (or whatever it was) to get that tracking skill yet and even if I had enough, I'm not interested in fighting others in a game like this.  I would love to have a custom server for this game.
Also, lint traps don't clean themselves.
It's the one thing that keeps us all coming back.
Oooooh torture porn. My favorite.
I will be doing a second part, thanks for the idea!
I'd be worried for the salmon if she can't swim...
Calling it now.  Someone is breaking through the glass tonight.
I think the next drunk chapter will be more closely related to the girl's wishes...  Something like Chitoge acting overly girly/sexy, Kosaki **about** to confess to Raku, Tsugumi trying to kiss Raku, Ruri's rant about how Japan is doomed, and so on...
god DAMN i'd probably leave a baby in that
Orton was pinned by Rollins after a Pedigree
A good multi-effects unit is probably one of the best investments you can make if you don't know what kind of effects you like. The Boss units are great, and stay pretty close to a lot of their pedals. As another user already said: "Figure out what you like and don't like about it".
now that you mention it you are right when it comes to car windows. that tempered glass is tough. ive seen more than a 5lb hammer swung by a huge guy bounce off a car window because the guy underestimated the glass.
Maybe 3 drams a week of scotch or bourbon. Each dram is no more than 2oz. A bottle will last me a couple months at least.
There wasn't anything for the awful hit on Sanguinetti during game 1, it's doubtful there will be something for this hit.
Snape. Snape. Sev - Ver - Us Snape   Aaand it was done already in further down the thread, of course...
This could be a normal reaction to stress, but as it's been going on for so long and you've had painful sex then I'd speak to a doctor for advice. Long term stress can have serious health consequences. The NHS website goes into detail [here]( http://www.nhs.uk/Conditions/loss-of-libido/Pages/Introduction.aspx) about related health and personal issues and when you should see a doctor about it.   The other important thing is to make sure your boyfriend understands what's happening. As you've already mentioned it could out strain on your relationship, but you might be able to work on the solution together.
What's the difference between a analrapist and a magician?  A magician pulls rabbits out of hats, whereas a analrapist pulls habits out of rats.  Huzzah!
At first I didn't see one either, but then one day it showed up under the upvote button. Try disabling then reenabling subreddit style, I'm not sure.
Oh shit I had forgotten about this that shit was glorious
Ordered a pair. These are gonna be my first razer purchase. Hopefully worth the price!
Fuckin' narc
Expected Haitch Face.  Was quite pleasantly disappointed.
Leverage that.
It was.
He's been the MVP for the team so far. 
Aw man, I have that pulp fiction BMF wallet. 
Uh I've been working out for years and I look great.  I'm just against people tricking others into thinking they need to buy supplements and related garbage.  You can't get her hipbone structure in the gym.
Sorry to hear that man! Hope you get feeling better really soon! :)
[*i told my publicist:* **"uprons to the left"**](//#oreilly)
You seem to think that this would be a simple process. It wouldn't be. Federal laws (and especially the federal tax code) are notoriously complex, and loopholes would be abound.  The easier thing to do would be to extend the definition of "marriage" to two men or two women.
So... what brought her to Sentinel in Hammerfell?
/Spacecars  If we don't have that shit figured out by 2115 then I don't want to keep on living.
That's.. unfortunate, because he's incredibly wrong. Look at Leffen or even Mang0 - when they laser camp, they have the advantage of not having to approach, which let's them have an easier time punishing a bad approach from their opponent. 
*efficiency*
I'm just a bit of a transit fan, subway especially. Also it's partly actually driving trains, partly meeting people who share a common interest.
If you're looking for a smart solution, there is the ecovent. Its basically a smart thermostat that remotely controls the vents. 
it happens, sometimes these people come up with clever ways of screwing you over even when they sell you legit phones (ex. bad imei number, they'll report it stolen after they sell it to you)
[I know right?](http://i.imgur.com/pOu9ey4.png)
I was gonna comment on this author's godawful spelling, but damn... Nevermind...  EDIT: [AAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!](http://i3.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/128/406/WTF.jpg)
Those are most likely SRT GC's. They're not like you and me. They're...different. 
Ok for whatever reason the only feed the network will let me watch is the Spanish one. Keep getting a try again error code from the English. 
Though you and I may infer the "but not necessarily so", the definition doesn't actually require any falsehood and is used correctly here. From an ELA teacher: Walk away from this fight. You cannot win it.
I didn't get the last gold variant for the credit purchase yet? Anyone else not get it yet?
hulk dog you say...? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pQlEr20uhv8
Pitching to the best hitter in the lineup with the tying run in scoring position, on the road, is a risky venture. Personally, I would have pitched to Fielder. If I'm walking Fielder, I'm walking Hamilton too. It really puts everyone in a huge bind when Pablo can't make that play. He needs to play back a bit more. 
just clicked
http://imgur.com/ppkhvYq  This is more what I was referring to. If you use the same emblem across three characters it's hard to tell which one is which.  Left to right helps a little bit but if you're transferring stuff that sits at the bottom of the page you'd have to scroll up to see which character was right or left, then back down to transfer the item.  Idk what I'm trying to accomplish here haha. It's hard to for me get the words to explain.
I started off at 13-41 on singles. I'm now beating top page teams on UMG. Anyone can do it if they try
To be fair over paying injury plagued veteran all stars is kind of our thing
Maybe I'm looking on the wrong place?  I went to the main CM site, and the last stable they are showing is cm-10.2.1-d2tmo.zip   PA was actually the last gapps I had tried.  Had good md5, but trying to install it fails on signature verification.  One thing perhaps I should note - I'm doing everything through sd card on this - the charging port is sketchy, and I only get comms with the phone through it about half the time, so I'm loading everything via sd card reader, then putting it into the phone and flashing from twrp.  Like I said - it all went great a week or so ago, but now I'm having problems...
Yes, the magical power of FREEZE PEACH means you get to say anything you want to me with zero consequences. That's totally how it works. /sssss
Por eso no. Porque ni ha prometido. Pero si prometiera tendriamos a Podemos apoyando ni mas ni menos que 35 años de gobierno continuo del PSOE de los ERES continuara.  Por ejemplo. ¿Que se le pide a PSOE que haga para darle la investidura de castilla la mancha? No se le va a poder pedir mas que cosas que solo podra aprobar una vez investido. Eso es investir a cambio de prometer que luego aprobará las medidas. Es dar un salto de fe con PSOE. Hostion asegurado.
You can have the golden axe and the slushie machine, but none of the wetsuits are available anymore, I'm sorry! I'll notify you when my gates are open :)
No, it is decisively disproven.
You probably need it if you want to register the game in your paradox forum profile.
I can't believe its been almost 4 years already. I miss that guy.
Straight outta 4chan
I WANNA BE THE VERY BEST
Hey there,   I'm removing this post for rule 2, but you can get it allowed again if you link a picture containing at least half of your face (eyes/nose, nose/mouth - can be only part of nose if you like - one eye/half nose/half mouth) in response to this comment.   Jump over to the sidebar real quick and just read the rules please! 
Thanks for snooping through it, Firefox gave a me get me out of here thing the first non-news link I clicked then I pussied out. This is a bunch of fat middle aged guys I was expecting men in scrubs perfecting the science of kebab.
Figo (Portugal) and Luisão (Benfica)
For your good luck, the 4th season (and unfortunately last, more like because they can't get more ideas out of it. I prefer to keep it on a peak than to get it die slowly on 30 seasons though) is starting at the end of June with a special with all people that played before (including the 3 champions).  About your questions there aren't really any other show similar to these two except a couple of episodes in 2 popular varieties. These kind of episodes, however, are more focused on long/physical chases (often through a large urban area like Seoul) with very simple but deep rules so what you see is more improvising and betraying each other for fun (and sometimes just to make it entertaining) than complex strategies. Also, the people playing it aren't really very intelligent people and that's kind of the charm. The point is to don't take everything they do that seriously.   I'm a infinity challenge fan (see my flair) so it's pretty much obligatory to recommend you some of them. Just try one and see if you can get hooked to the difference that you will see in the style. Also, the show isn't really about this, so look for the episodes when they do this.  The most recent "chase" (2 episodes) they did:  http://www.dramafever.com/drama/4337/66/Infinity_Challenge/?ap=1 http://www.dramafever.com/es/drama/4337/67/Infinity_Challenge/?ap=1  (if you live in America or have a good proxy) or http://www.epdrama.com/infinity-challenge/infinity-challenge-episode-414/ and http://www.epdrama.com/infinity-challenge/infinity-challenge-episode-415/
It should be `javac parade.java`
*slap* NO
Final boss cow?
$17 at Wal-Mart
I traded a bunch to get it together, but I think it was worth it. Thanks!
Repost Cops need to be banned.
Ha.... what a travesty. I will personally laugh in the face of everyone who thought the Scarborough subway or any subway in Scarborough can be built.
Of course the city has great respect for them. It has even build a gated community specifically for them. 
Op, does your school have your diagnosis documented?   My friend has ADHD and her brother stole her prescription.  The school infirmary gave her a very limited prescription to get her through 2 weeks before she could get bac home to see her doctor out of state.  
Presented by TOTINO'S  IT'S LIKE PIZZA, BUT KIND OF!^TM
You can have all of those! I'll notify you when I open my gates :)
There are plenty of people who made post about the story so far.  http://www.dualshockers.com/2012/11/14/final-fantasy-xiv-the-story-so-far-episode-1-beginnings/  All the cutscenes  http://finalfantasyxivcutscenes.com/
Do you wanna hit this?
[Signs of a social/cognitive delay](http://www.babycenter.com/0_warning-signs-of-a-social-cognitive-delay_12654.bc). Keep in mind though that all kids develop at different rates.   As an adult with cognitive deficits, if she does have an issue, *please* be careful about how you speak and act about it. The *shame* I picked up from my parents still makes it hard for me to ask for help when I need it.
That is depressing. Also, nice play on quest title.
lol that sweet necro reply, i lmao'd when you called me a stupid faggot im like wtf hahahahaha holy shit that was a good laugh.
Plenty of idiots* were pissed at Bolt for doing that
http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/h5uet/what_is_the_point_of_adding_friends_on_reddit/
Lateral us and strawberry overtone 3mg. Thanks for the giveaway!
Other variable I can see is the difficulty of it, meaning a higher cost in AP for the whole run, changing the number of AP per wave. Also you always have to factor if you gained AP during the run (entered a second before it gave 1 AP, finished just after it gave another AP, mostly can variate no more than 2 AP)
I think it is good for pregnant women to know that if something seems off, they should go in and get it checked out. If you're not sure if something is normal or not, it's better to be safe than sorry.
Can I get a safety as good as Reed? If so, I want that. Him and Will Hill locking it down, baby.
I'm glad to have some of the other side's argument here.  I happen to play sacrier, and 8 skills is more than enough for me to efficiently do my job. I had completely forgotten about Fecas (oh god.. the spells needed)
Fun survey, thanks for posting. But, to be honest, I really disliked the last question because I honestly think that /r/gallifrey is the only Dr Who Themed Subreddit worth looking at. You should add a Neither option.  Here are some Other cool questions worth asking or adding:  Which tardis incarnation do you prefer (or rate them)  Which Intro sequence do you prefer (or rate them)  Which major recurring villain do you prefer (or rate them)
That sounds really doubtful.  What religion is Seneca talking about?  Judaism?  Religion/religio just meant a cultural/societal obligation.  "Religion" didn't exist as a concept until evangelical religions like Christianity and Islam came about.
Lift weights and lose weight until you're 180lbs. Monitor your calories, track your weight change, and lift hard. But your number one goal should be to drop the fat. 
There goes my day. This is great 
What the fuck, "distilled from 100% selected grains."
It's actually really easy once you understand how it works. So for anyone that is already familiar with the program, this really wouldn't take more than 10 minutes. 
And then there was a guy that posted about  The guy that followed the girl  That walked her tire  At 4 am
Little advice for you, based on your other question in this thread- the 9 month compressed paramedic course is going to be pretty tough on most people, particularly those without prior experience. If you're going to go for a 9-month paramedic school, I'd suggest a long sit-down with an instructor and a serious soul-searching to see if you're willing to do it.  I'm personally not against "zero-to-hero" classes (people with no experience going straight from EMT to medic), although I have a few reservations about 9-month paramedic courses, as do many instructors. But the combination is a real ball-buster.
you mean the c9 with their own farming, low early pressure jungler?
That hairstyle will never be attractive on males or females. Ever.
Byron Saxton would make Carlton Banks cringe in shame
Calling out bigotry is bad on reddit.
That's not what that thread is about at all. It is saying that a pedophile (note that this is someone who is attracted to children not necessarily one who acts on it) cannot change their situation. They cannot stop such an attraction. They only can fight their impulses and not act on it. It's a burden and it is not their fault. A fat person cannot claim their struggle is the same.
You're welcome :)
Thank you kindly!
Who's winning hide and seek meow?!
It looks like you were downvoted by your own brigade, but also this issue has NOTHING to do with mods whatsoever.  Even rockstar encourages mods offline. To try to imply any different is insanity.  This is about cheating. They are 2 completely seperate issues, and most people are smart enough to understand that distinction.  Cheating, and wanting to cheat so bad you brigade to create confusion is pathetic.  Modding is creative.
Yeah the predictability was the main issue I noticed. He shoulda gone Stadium for the last match as he couldn't do much with FD.
All right let's see. It's too bad you don't have Macho Legs, cause he really is useful here against those Rain D. Do you have Paris? That cat can substitute too. If you have Ubers they can help too (depends on what Uber).  Line 1: Crazed Macho, Crazed Wall, Eraser, Crazed Whale, Crazed UFO  Line 2: King Dragon, Crazed Dragon, Jamiera, Bahamut,Ururun   You won't need Rich Cat here, so just stall the Pigeons de Sable for money here until you reach max efficiency and money. After reaching max money and everything, spam the Crazed Cats (Whale, UFO, Dragon) plus King Dragon (a handful, like 3 of each if possible). Once you hit the base, BOSS PARADE! I was honestly surprised with this level. Shit tons of bosses and took me a few tries to finish it too.  Anyways first up is Kory, Camelle and Nyandam. Just send out your casual Crazed + King Dragon to finish him however the Rain D's will start appearing (they are the true pain in the ass here) so start sending out meatshields (2-3 of them, depends how many Rain D's there are) plus Bahamut and Ururun. This is tricky, cause you won't be able to hold them off well if you don't use meatshields but you might get shockwaved to death. Just hope you dealt enough damage to Kory to finish him (if you killed him before the Rain D's come, good). Now comes a critical part, you should do enough damage to the Rain D's here and try to synch their attacks using Cat Cannon (including Camelle). Your army will probably get wiped out after this, Jamiera won't be useful until the Rain D's die. If you get cornered, spam meatshields and stall till you can summon your Bahamut and a few range cats (I'll go for Crazed UFO with this one, if you have Paris she can knockback better). When I did this they almost reach my base, a few centimeters away but killed them. If you managed to kill the Rain D's take a breather and send out Jamiera to deal with Camelle (watch out for Nyandam, so you should still spawn meatshields) and send occasional Crazed Cats + King Dragon too. A Teacher Bear and Dark Otter spawns occasionally, they aren't much of a threat with meatshields but they will kill your Jamiera before he reach Camelle, so deal with them. If you can summon Ururun/Bahamut, go ahead. After killing the Camelle, Nyandam is left and you can take him on himself. I think the Teacher Bear and Dark Otter still spawns until he's dead, be careful. Wall Doge also spawns here. BOOM! You thought it's over? A Pair of Angel Sleipnir comes out of the base. Not much of a threat with 3 meatshields, Crazed Cats and King Dragon. Sending Jamiera's help too. You should have Bahamut and Ururun to deal with them faster. After killing them only Pigeons and Wall Doges remain, and you have won the stage.  Honestly, not everything will go according to plan. This stage requires you to adapt every now and then. Change your strategy according to the bosses/enemies you will face and the situation you are in (how many are them, how far are them from your base etc.) I just give general tips in handling this stage and possible scenarios. Challenging and a fun stage! Goodluck! (Tried this with Tesalan Pasalan recently, walk in the park XD)
God I forgot about those things.  I remember they would sell them at Burger King.  I picked up like half a dozen for my nephews. lol!
I cost me $9000 to put on my shoes right now.
Shit, its like some shit you'd expect to see in a twisted metal game.
People love to be offended.
Suunto Zoop!
I saw a video of a man getting crushed by an elevator, now I just take the stairs
I think it's any job. From what I've understood you get to spend a year in the country, and you're allowed to work if you want. You shouldn't have a big problem finding a job in IT.  Edit: browse website of companies and look for their job offerings. You can find a list of well known companies operating in Sweden at http://universumglobal.com/rankings/sweden/ Another option is to get a licenciat degree. The PhD education in Sweden is a little different, a full PhD takes 4 years, but you can get a half PhD (licenciat) in 2 years. Those positions are paid, and universities are probably more flexible with international people.
Nice set!
I have never, not once, ever had a problem with fibre op.  I've used it for over 3 years now and it has been bulletproof. Reliable,  consistent, and fast. It's incredible but you pay for it.
Well it's Nintendo so the prices would be low.
me too thanks
ADD Mr-Twists 34 warlock
A bit past. I think he was in issue 129 and they are around 170 or so with the reprints. Sadly I'm at issue 60 with my reading so a while to go!
I've been doing it with bread and its been working. Thanks though! 
Wish fairies dropped pre evolved -.-... max skilled two mini rgy's and still 0 skillups on perseus.. x.x   28 more green poopheads to evolve
Seems likely, just a matter of how soon it will happen.  All I'm going to say is that this summer is going to be extremely scary for the world.  I feel like we're in a point of time where all we need is a straw to break the backs of all of the issues we have going on right now.  If we do get a false flag attack, it's going to be larger than any particular attack that we've ever had.
You're too thick to realize fighting racist lending practices is fighting a ghost and what you want to put your effort into, if you don't want to look like an imbecile wasting his time, are lending practices which take advantage of the poor and uneducated.   But I'll play your silly game. Yes, racist lending practices would be bad. That is a stupid ass bait question you already know the answer to. Now tell me how they would justify burning your community down, stealing your communities medicine to sell and get high off if, beating up cops, stealing soda and chips, and targeting Asian shopkeepers. And tell me how that would make these actions not only okay but productive in terms of fighting it.
what div do you play may I ask?
Well yeah. Those Broncos teams were plain unfair.  And then he finally got the knights and Johns was forced to retire Due to injury early. He had a lot of bad luck. 
My manly zero suit samus-ness demands fixes!  &gt;D
So I looked at your TVFool report again, I don't think you are in "attic install" range, I think Roof is your best bet with the distance. If you get a pre-amp, that may help your attic install.   The pre-amp doesn't need to be installed in the attic. You can plug in the charging part inside right before it gets to your TV or splitter.
What would you recommend for a BIFL radio? Not trying to be a dick, just open minded for finding something better.
verevolfe!
Blast everyone with potatoes guns until they declare me the ruler. 
Great tip, but I could just imagine some dickhead cop rolling up and arresting everyone for public intoxication. 
Jack Slack is full of shit and his "work" is 99% bias
He said companions not companions' handbags.
I think it would be so cool if Kelly's intro shot in Second Chance is similar or the same as hers in the Borneo intro. That'd be a pretty cool callback to 15 years ago.
I blow my load everynight....
Trust me, this is very very normal. 95% of people your age (mine too, for the record) have no idea what the hell what they are doing with their lives, and the rest are probably lying. The fact that you have a passion, and more importantly that you recognize that passion, is really really great and I hope you continue to pursue it.  As for having never been kissed, again, totally normal no matter what you may have heard. My first kiss was when I was 19, but more importantly it didn't happen then because I hit some magical age but because it was the right time for me. Take a deep breath, trust me, you will be ok.
Damn 
Works for me.  Copy/paste the title into google. The link from Google should work.
Good on him. Fuck that uppity barista. I don't recall a rule that says when I'm supposed to drink coffee.
Have meta sorry
I don't think so, but I'm also really colorblind. It looked black to me. 
&gt;they  &gt;us  picard.facepalm
All of them /u/cabledawg1, all of them. 
Just tuned in to baseball tonight. What the fuck was that?
...Is League getting some sort of Love and War update?
iSideWith.com is an interesting site.  Maybe it'll give you ideas on that.
Good.
You can have both of those! I'll notify you when I open my gates :)
I assure you I wasn't talking class or pvp specifically.
X3TC, somewhat surprisingly.
It isn't a perfect world though, is it? It's Thailand, and prostitution over there seems to have an even more storied history with trafficking than most places.
OK got it.
YAY!!  Sounds like she's getting there!  Keep letting her take her time, that's what my husband did and now we're both out!
I just saw your video and channel and subscribed. Your enthusiasm for anything laser related is dope.  How did you get into lasers as a hobby?
Is there anyway for sure to know?
Honestly, I don't see why this is being misinterpreted as gender inequality. The reason ISNA highschool did not want to play is not because they see women as inferior, but rather, because islam teaches us to avoid mingling with those of the opposite sex to avoid physical attraction between a male and female. This is the same reason women are told to dress modestly, and men told to lower their gaze. The muslim team was not aware that the other highschools boys team consisted of some girls, which is ISNA's problem. To make up for their mistake, they offered to forefit. The other school, instead of accepting a forfeit, offered to substitute their girl players for boys.   In Islam, we are taught to respect women. They are our mothers, sisters, daughters, and we have the utmost respect for females. Islam came at a time when daughters were seen as a burden and people would bury their kids alive if they had daughters. Islam was against this and saved people from ignorance. If you read the Qur'an, you'll find no religion elevates the status of a woman like islam. This article has nothing to do with gender inequality.
Here's a collection of similar images from the same producer if anyone's interested:  * http://i.imgur.com/sBYDy3G.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/DhX1ACp.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/A77zF75.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/BVaGQzt.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/YOBE6x0.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/EhOmgLy.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/O3DYBSO.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/2nO3hzn.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/4DDiN7B.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/74ffs5T.jpg * http://i.imgur.com/6YUo2Oz.jpg
What would you like to see?
It was never confirmed, basically the internet speculating
Fuck! My favorite too now!
I've got him too lol
Yeah, but how many people are aware of the situation? Us. Not the news stations.
http://askubuntu.com/questions/16446/how-to-get-my-software-into-ubuntu
It isn't "confusing", it's simply a poorly thought out position. It is kind of strange to call yourself a member of the Catholic Church when you assign no authority whatsoever to the Church's teachings and it itself states that you will burn for eternity in Hell for disagreeing with it.  I get it - there are social reasons why one might continue to be a "cultural Catholic" whilst not actually holding the Catholic faith, but if you're going to do so, it is better to be honest about it instead of trying to justify a theology which is barely even self-consistent.
Rent is still $1000 either way. And food/gas on VI is likely more expensive, because everything has to be imported by boat.
Here is a buddy and fellow clan mate.   https://youtu.be/iHULLiTm2R4
Here you go http://www.slashfilm.com/jurassic-world-early-buzz/
&gt; I've got buddies and acquaintances, but the only person I feel I'm actually close to is my BF.  Preach! 22F here too. My boyfriend is my best friend, but aside from him I'm kind of a floater. I know I'm not a weirdo or anything, I just have trouble transitioning talking at school/work to hanging out on weekends. This thread has made me feel so much better, I'm not the only one. 
I have the article and love it. Even got blue glass for it. Yea it can gurgle a little but it can have a higher wattage. Or you can get the kangertank that comes with a rebuildable option. My husband has it and really likes his. 
You can play as Ryu in Smash Bros? 
I prefer to think of it as a worse assassinate
The rest of the [schedule](http://www.wspa.com/story/29185855/sec-revises-basketball-scheduling-each-team-gets-three-set-foes), since it wasn't in this link.  &gt; Each SEC team will play the other 13 teams at least one time during league play. They will then play their three permanent opponents a second time and the remaining two games will be scheduled on a rotating basis.  Also, a [map showing this visually](http://imgur.com/7cG5Z5Z), based on the work /u/aTs2012 did in [this post](http://www.reddit.com/r/CFB/comments/34az7n/no_division_sec_maps_included/).
Nope, Johnson only has three wins at Pocono. Swept 2004 and the June, 2013 race.
I am a young 35 and my wife is 25. :) 
Yup.
Yep, I cannot say no to a Steam sale or a Humble Bundle. I have over 6 hundred fucking games and only play a few of them.
Give off your high horse asshole.
Well he missed the kid so I guess not
I don't know why you guys get so emo over it. I've also been a CLG fan since season 1 with all the disappointments and drama. But, I do still enjoy when they win.  I will care about playoffs when its time for playoffs, and I'll care about worlds when it is time for worlds. But at the moment, I like watching the team I cheer for win. 
*goer
MALDY
This reminded me that I went to high school with a YEC girl who thought dinosaurs were a trick by scientists to make people worship Satan. She wanted to be a doctor.  Did some lurking on Facebook and found some old posts about quitting college because she's failing her biology classes since they only teach lies. Not too surprising.
pretty good idea
Just a nice merlot from California. Not the best wine out there but I'm saving my vintage bottles for special occasions. 
Watched a commercial about Wal-Mart "investing" in their employees. Saying there spending millions and such. At the end of it I was wondering why I needed to know that... 
"Never"? How soon we forget the Hall of Pain.
